Table      of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - FEATURE:  Japan Expanding Auto Industry 
Trade With China 

   Economic Trends - FEATURE:  Hatakeyama Writes Article on Japan- 
U.S. Trade Issues; FEATURE:  New MOFA Deputy Minister for Economic 
Affairs; MITI To Simplify Export Controls on Strategic Commodities 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Financial Institutions Expanding 
Asian Operations; MOF Interim Report on Financial Institution 
Disclosure; Taiwan Authorizes Securities Firms To Establish, Upgrade 
Offices 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Japanese Firms Setting Up 
Operations in Shenzhen; Chisso Engineering, Nichimen Win 
Petrochemical Plant Contract 

   EASTERN EUROPE:  Marubeni To Expand Sales Networks in Poland, 
Hungary, Russia 

   NORTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Political Figures 'Scheming' To Revive 
Trade With Pyongyang 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  Activities of Machine Tool, Industrial Machinery 
Firms 

   VIETNAM:  Firms Expanding Offices, Forming Investment Plans; 
Paper Firm, Nissho Iwai in Joint-Venture Forestry Project; 
Association Studying Private Funding for Agricultural Projects 

   Japan-U.S. Trade Issues -- Reaction of Glass Industry to U.S. 
Super 301 Decision 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - Fanuc, Yamazaki Conclude Agreements With 
Chinese Firms; Star Micronics To Close Eight European Sales 
Companies 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - Mitsubishi Electric Initiates 
Multimedia Equipment Business Activities; MPT To Deliberate on 
Digital Communications Satellite Broadcasting 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Machine-Building Industry 
Formulates Development Plan; Article Examines Regional Disparities 
of Rural Enterprises; Bank of China Registers Increase in Renminbi 
Savings Deposits; Official Says New Tax Laws Discourage Taiwan 
Investment; Guangzhou To Build International Airport, Invites 
Foreign Investment; Guangzhou To Sell State Enterprises to 
Foreigners; Guangdong To Invest 630 Million Yuan To Develop Port 
Projects; Guangdong To Invest 12 Billion Yuan in Transportation; 
Hainan's Yuangpu Port Planning Major Expansion; Fujian Aquatic 
Products Industry Reports Rising Growth; Shandong's Retail Sales 
Grow Rapidly; Shenzhen Invests in Tourist Industry 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Cross-Strait Computer Industry 
Cooperation Thrives; PRC, Vietnam Planning To Build Joint Border 
Economic Zone; Shanghai To Expand Opportunities for Foreign 
Investment; Tianjin Establishes Foreign-Funded Enterprises; 
Enterprises in Fujian's ROK-Sponsored Industrial Zone Begin 
Operatio; ROK's Samsung Group's China Trade To Increase in 1994; 
PRC, ROK To Jointly Build Large Oil Refinery in Shenzhen; South 
Korean Electronics Firm To Produce TV Parts, VCR's; South Korean 
Company To Build Two Power Plants in Henan Province; South Korea 
Signs Telecommunications Joint Venture in Beijing; Israel To Set Up 
Aircraft Repair Joint Venture; Sino-French Joint Venture Launched in 
Automobile Industry; Italian Banking Group To Provide $75 Million in 
Export Credit Loans; Singapore Joint Venture To Produce Cigarette 
Paper in Hangzhou; CITIC's Plans To Jointly Develop Zhejiang's Daxie 
Island; Asian Investment Group Raises Funds To Invest in Auto Parts 
Industry; Jiangsu's Nantong Port Becomes Major Import-Export Port; 
Liaoning Attracted More Foreign Capital 

   Taiwan:  Planning Council Says Annual Per-Capita Output Value 
Increases; Executive Yuan Says Economy To Grow by 6.32 Percent This 
Year; Trade Board Says Benefits of GATT Entry Would Outweigh Losses; 
Directorate Announces Figures on Imports of Technology; Ministry 
Draws Up Plan To Strengthen Economic Work in Southeast Asia; 
Taipei's Exports to PRC Valued at $12.8 Billion in 1993; Taipei 
Lifts Ban on Textile Investments in PRC; Petroleum Company Plans To 
Build Industrial Zones in Indonesia, SRV; Finance Minister Views 
Taxes, Investment With Indonesian Counterpart; Cabinet Views 
Cooperation With Thailand, Indonesia, the Philippines; Economic 
Minister Holds Forum With Electric Appliance Makers 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Increased ROK Trade, Investment in 
Vietnam Reported; FEATURE:  ROK Electronics Firms Profit Through 
U.S. High-Tech; FEATURE:  Press Urges Continuous Government Support 
for HDTV; FEATURE:  Recent Semiconductor Developments Reported; New 
Techno-Complex To Merge Industrial, Academic Research; Multipurpose 
Research Reactor Nearing Completion; Samsung 'Gets Serious' About 
Aircraft Engine Development; Patent Office To Set Up Center To 
Promote Patent Commercialization; Tax Audits Based on Foreign Car 
Ownership To Stop; Samsung Wins Order for Gas Platform Off Malaysia; 
LCD Makers Form 'United Front' Against Foreign Patent Offensive; 
Textile Firms' Investment in China Increasing; Kia Sets Up Auto 
Assembly Joint Venture in Indonesia; Samsung-Mitsubishi Consortium 
Wins Shipbuilding Order; MOTIE Reports on Construction Contracts in 
China; Dong-Ah To Build Two Power Plants in China; Goldstar To 
Invest $200 Million in VCR, CRT Plants in China; Yukong Working 
Towards Oil Refinery Agreement With China 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - BURMA:  FEATURE:  Barter Trade Activities in 
Burma Reported 

   INDONESIA:  Indocement Signs Agreement With Korean, Japanese 
Firms; Official Predicts Growth in Stock Trading; Banking Sector Has 
$12.7 Billion in Bad Debts; 1993 Coal Production Reaches 27 Million 
Metric Tons 

   LAOS: Norwegian, Thai Firms Contract To Design Hydropower Dam 

   MALAYSIA:  Incentives for Eastern Corridor Announced; 
Telecommunications Investment Opportunity Offered; Joint Venture 
Plant To Be Built in Algeria; Joint-Venture Petrochemical Plant in 
Johor Inaugurated; Company Forms Joint Venture With Vietnamese Firm 

   PHILIPPINES:  Government Approves Power Plant Project 

   THAILAND:  Bank Credit Expansion, Inflation Rate Reported; 
Military Bank Grants Loans to Vietnamese Bank; State Petroleum Firm 
Forms Joint Ventures in PRC, Vietnam; Power Plant To Be Established 
With PRC's Wuxi Province; Company Invests in Hotel Construction in 
Burma; Bank Arranges Loan for SRV Central Bank 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Increased ROK Trade, Investment in Vietnam 
Reported (See SOUTH KOREA); Singapore's Keppel Group To Invest in 
Shipbuilding, Construction; Singapore To Assist in Building New 
Industrial Zone; Daewoo Investments in Vietnam Reported; Effect of 
Devalued Yuan on Trade Reported; Growing Demand for Cars Reported; 
Joint Venture With Hong Kong Firm To Renovate Office Complex; 
Southern Provinces To Build Rice Mill With South Korea; Steel Joint 
Venture Formed With ROK Companies; Oil Services Company Expands 
Operations; Government To Restore Two Riverways; Dong Nai Has 53 
Licensed Investment Projects; Rice Exports Reached 1.7 Million 
Metric Tons in 1993; Swedish Group Looks To Increase Trade; Hong 
Kong Firm, Southern Provinces To Build Rice Mill; Cement Joint- 
Venture Company Inaugurated; Quang Nam-Da Nang Hosting 25 Foreign 
Ventures; Australian Firm Invests $197 Million in 
Telecommunications; Thai Firm To Invest in Fishing Net Factory; 
Japanese Firm Sets Up Wood Chips Joint Venture 

   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-07) 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - FEATURE:  Japan Expanding Auto Industry 
Trade With China -- SUMMARY:  Japan's auto industry trade with China 
is rapidly expanding, according to press reports.  Auto exports to 
China increased substantially in 1993, but recent Chinese 
restrictions will likely decrease exports in 1994.  Consequently, at 
the urging of both the Chinese and Japanese Governments, Japan's 
auto parts firms are moving aggressively to establish joint ventures 
to produce and sell auto parts in China. 

   According to statistics compiled by the Ministry of Finance and 
retrieved from the Nikkei Telecom News and Retrieval Database, 
exports of Japanese four-wheel vehicles to China surged in 1993. 
Passenger vehicle exports on a U.S.-dollar basis expanded 148 
percent compared to 1992.  In 1993 Japan's automakers exported more 
than $3 billion worth of passenger vehicles, trucks, and buses to 
China, including Hong Kong.  These large increases occurred despite 
high tariffs on auto-related imports, which,  according to the 5 
January NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI), included a 220 percent tariff 
on gasoline-powered automobiles. 

   A breakdown of Ministry of Finance statistics concerning auto 
exports to China and Hong Kong from 1990 through 1993, via the 
Nikkei Telecom News and Retrieval Database, is as follows (figures 
are in millions of dollars): 


             Passenger 
             Vehicles        Trucks         Buses          Total 
China 

1990            $34            $78            $21           $133 
1991            $73           $184            $55           $312 
1992           $246           $328           $133           $707 
1993           $610           $458           $179         $1,247 

Hong Kong 

1990           $331           $126            $44           $501 
1991           $511           $172            $70           $753 
1992         $1,103           $257           $117         $1,477 
1993         $1,445           $288           $114         $1,847 



   Unclear Prospects for Increased Auto Exports to China - On 1 
January 1994 the Chinese Government lowered tariffs on imported 
automobiles, but these reductions are unlikely to lead to 
dramatically higher imports of Japanese vehicles, according to the 5 
January NIKKEI.  Tariffs on cars with gasoline and diesel engines 
still remain at between 110 and 150 percent.  Furthermore, according 
to NIKKEI, while the Chinese Government is lowering these tariffs to 
facilitate its accession into GATT, it will continue to "manage" 
imports to protect domestic production. 

   In fact, according to the 10 March SANKEI SHIMBUN, Japanese 
automakers expect exports of four-wheel vehicles to China in 1994 to 
fall to "about half" the level of 1993--to about 100,000 units, 
including finished cars and knockdown kits.  Japanese manufacturers 
also fear that Chinese policy reforms will lead to new import 
barriers, so they are adopting a "cautious stance," especially with 
regard to passenger vehicles. 

   As an example of the automakers' divergent planning, SANKEI cited 
the case of Isuzu Motors, which primarily makes commercial vehicles. 
The company plans to export "about the same number of vehicles" as 
last year.  In contrast, the main passenger car manufacturers, such 
as Toyota and Nissan, anticipate a reduction in exports by 30 to 80 
percent.  Last year Toyota exported just under 50,000 vehicles, 
including 5,000 knockdown units, but this year it plans to lower 
exports of finished cars to about "20 percent of last year's level" 
while increasing exports of knockdown units.  SANKEI noted that 
Nissan Motor Co., which exported 30,000 finished cars last year, 
will have difficulty exporting "half that amount this year," and 
Honda Motor Co. now plans to export 8,000 units, about 30 percent 
less than last year. 

   Both Governments Encouraging Auto Parts Joint Ventures - To 
protect and promote the development of China's indigenous automobile 
industry, Beijing maintains high tariffs on auto imports as well as 
restrictions on the production of passenger vehicles by foreign 
automakers in China.  At the same time, according to the 27 March 
NIKKEI, the Chinese Government is actively soliciting Japanese 
investment and participation in the development of China's auto 
parts sector.  The Chinese Government has adopted a policy of 
promoting the domestic production of "six critical parts," including 
engines and auto bodies, according to the 4 March NIKKEI.  The 21 
March NIKKEI reported that during Prime Minister Hosokawa's recent 
trip to China, Chinese Vice Premier Zhu Rongji "urged" Japanese 
investment in China's auto part sector, "especially in engines." 

   Japan's Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) 
announced on 17 March that it will sponsor a conference in June 
together with the Chinese Government concerning "cooperation between 
the Japanese and Chinese auto parts industries."  According to the 
17 March NIKKEI, MITI hopes the conference will help Japan's auto 
companies penetrate China's market.  To promote joint ventures, MITI 
has already begun compiling a list of Japanese parts makers that 
want to establish production bases in China.  NIKKEI noted that 
there are about 4,000 auto parts plants operating in China.  The 
conference will be organized by officials of the Japan Auto Parts 
Industries Association (JAPIA) and by Chinese officials in the auto 
parts sector.  JAPIA is a nonprofit association under the 
administrative  authority of MITI's Machinery Information and 
Industries Bureau. 

   Joint-Venture Agreements With Chinese Auto Parts Companies - 
Japanese firms in recent months have signed a number of joint 
venture agreements concerning auto parts production in China.  The 
following are among the more important recent agreements reported in 
the Japanese press: 

   Itochu Corp., one of Japan's largest general trading companies, 
has formed an "inclusive" business agreement with the China National 
Automotive Industry Corp. (CNAIC), a quasi-governmental organization 
that overseas the development of China's auto industry, concerning 
the manufacture and sales of auto parts, according to the 20 January 
NIKKEI.  Itochu will import parts processing technologies from 
Japan, Europe, and the United States and will develop operations in 
cooperation with CNAIC, which is attempting to improve the quality 
of Chinese-made auto parts. 

   Nissan Diesel Motor Co. is forming a joint venture company with 
Dongfeng Automobile Co. (formerly the Second Autoworks) to produce 
trucks in Hangzhou, according to the 4 January NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN. 
Nissan Diesel signed a contract with Dongfeng in August 1985 to 
transfer large truck production technology, after which the scope of 
the agreement expanded.  In May 1993 the two firms began a 
feasibility study on a truck production joint venture company, which 
will be 49 percent owned by Nissan Diesel and 51 percent by 
Dongfeng.  According to NIKKAN KOGYO, the new company will produce 
about 4,000 vehicles annually with a domestic content ratio of 
between 10 to 20 percent.  The company plans to raise this ratio as 
domestic parts makers are developed and more Japanese parts makers 
establish operations in China. 

   Toyota Motor is moving to expand the transfer of automotive 
technology to the Shenyang Jinbei Automobile Manufacturing Co., 
according to the 4 March NIKKEI.  Toyota had signed a series of 
production and technology-sharing agreements with Jinbei, but 
following the Chinese Government's policy of "indigenous" auto parts 
production, Toyota has moved to help Jinbei produce a number of 
"critical" auto parts that have been imported from Japan.  In 1989 
Toyota contracted to provide welding and press processing technology 
to Jinbei, and in 1992 it agreed to provide technology knowhow 
concerning physical distribution, assembly, and painting.  Now 
Toyota will provide Jinbei with drive train production technology. 
NIKKEI reported that Toyota is also considering capital investment 
in Jinbei to strengthen their "cooperative relationship" in 
anticipation of "serious auto production" in China. 

   Kansai Paint Co., Japan's largest paint manufacturer, has 
established a joint-venture company with the Shenyang Paint Factory 
to produce and sell auto paint in China, according to the 16 March 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN. Kansai Paint has had a technology-sharing 
agreement with Shenyang Paint since 1985.  The joint-venture 
company, "Shenyang Kansai Paint Co.," will be capitalized at $5 
million, with Kansai providing 40 percent Shenyang 60 percent.  A 
plant will be built in Shenyang City this autumn, and should begin 
operations by January 1995 with an annual capacity of 5,000 tons 
within five years.  In its first year, the company will produce 
about 2,000 tons of both primer and topcoat auto paint for sale in 
China.  NIKKEI SANGYO added that because Nippon Paint, Kansai 
Paint's main rival, is also moving into China, "competition is 
likely to become fierce." 

   Taikisha Ltd., Japan's largest manufacturer of auto painting 
equipment, is establishing a joint venture firm in Beijing with the 
Fifth Planning and Research Institute, a subsidiary of the China 
North Industries Corp. (NORINCO), according to the 17 March NIKKEI 
SANGYO.  The new company, will be capitalized at $600,000 on a 51/49 
percent basis between Taikisha and the institute, will be called the 
"Wuzhou Taikisha Construction Company."  Taikisha has determined 
that the rapid expansion of Japanese auto companies in China is 
heightening demand for painting equipment and facilities.  The 
institute to date has designed vehicles like tanks, "but is now 
switching over to civilian applications." 

   Economic Trends - FEATURE:  Hatakeyama Writes Article on Japan- 
U.S. Trade Issues -- SUMMARY:  Noboru Hatakeyama, former Ministry of 
International Trade and Industry (MITI) vice minister for 
international affairs, writing in EKONOMISUTO, offered his 
assessment of the currently suspended Japan-U.S. framework talks and 
the bilateral trade situation.  He also outlined six 
"recommendations" for Japan in negotiating with the United States. 

   Hatakeyama, who currently works for the MITI-sponsored Japan 
Economic Foundation, in a 15 March EKONOMISUTO article expressed his 
belief that the U.S.-Japan summit meeting in February proceeded in a 
"businesslike manner," with both countries speaking frankly about 
bilateral issues.  He claimed that the somewhat "nationalistic" 
reaction in Japan to Prime Minister Hosokawa's performance is 
"worrisome," because all Hosokawa did was to "passionately reject" 
proposals which were not acceptable--"specifically, items concerning 
numerical targets" --which "no other free market country could 
accept." 

   Hatakeyama rejected the argument that Japan's uncompromising 
stance at the talks was due to the changed security situation 
following the end of the Cold War.  He argued that the significance 
of the U.S.-Japan security relationship has in fact grown since the 
end of the Cold War. 

   According to Hatakeyama, in the past Japan "conceded" in U.S.- 
Japan economic talks "purely for the benefit of the Japanese 
economy."  Japan has agreed to abide by numerous U.S. import 
restrictions, conclude sector-specific agreements such as the 
semiconductor agreement, and hold talks on structural impediments, 
he asserted, so as "to hold on as long as possible" to the economic 
benefits derived from its "export structure." 

   Hatakeyama asserted that in the framework talks, the "first 
mistake" of the U.S. side was to demand numerical targets, because 
the Japanese side was "sufficiently ready to make concessions" 
outside of numerical targets.  He noted that, although President 
Clinton "did not give the impression" of demanding numerical 
targets, American officials in the negotiations "did indeed, demand 
numerical targets" by using such phrases as "comparative market 
share" and "increasing sales volumes."  He stated that in the past 
there have been U.S. demands "which have been somewhat impossible," 
but nothing like numerical targets, which, he said, clearly run 
counter to market principles and deregulation.  This approach, he 
maintained, "destroys the basic human rights of a modern citizenry" 
because failure to achieve the targets set will result in 
"unilateral measures," such as Super 301, and managed trade becomes 
more like "coercive trade." 

   Hatakeyama Argues Japan's Markets Are Not Closed - Hatakeyama 
went on to say that President Clinton's statement after the February 
summit that "Japan is the most closed market of the G-7 countries" 
is a "misinterpretation" of Japan's manufacturing market.  He said 
there are three factors which determine whether a market is open or 
closed--"water's edge" government regulations, which restrict 
imports or authorize import tariffs; domestic regulations, which 
standardize and certify environmental protection and consumer 
safety; and traditional business practices of the private sector. 

   According to Hatakeyama, an examination of the four basic trade 
markets--manufactured goods, petroleum and minerals, agricultural 
products, and services--reveals that Japan is running a deficit 
balance of payments with the United States in each of these markets 
except for the manufactured goods, where it runs a $65 billion 
surplus, resulting in an aggregate Japanese surplus of $50 billion. 
He asserted that no new "water's-edge"-type government regulations 
have been introduced regarding imports since the market was 
liberalized for color TV sets in 1964, automobiles in 1965, 
semiconductors in 1974, computers in 1975, and leather goods in 
1985.  The fact that the United States instituted the multinational 
fiber agreement and allegedly created "import barriers" in the form 
of regulations for passenger cars, steel, and machine tools in the 
1980's offers a "striking comparison," he stated.  He claimed that 
the European Union, which requires monitors for Japanese automobile 
imports, "is more closed than Japan."  In terms of import tariffs, 
the average import tariff rate for manufactured goods imported into 
Japan is 1.9 percent, which is one-third of the 5.5 percent imposed 
in the United States and 5.6 percent in Europe, he added. 

   In Japan's services market, he conceded, there are regulations 
concerning the telecommunications, finance, and distribution 
sectors, but he pointed out that in the United States there are also 
"state-by-state" regulations for financial institutions, while EU 
countries such as France, Italy, and Belgium have several 
distribution-related regulations.  These comparisons, Hatakeyama 
maintained, must be made before stating that Japan's markets are the 
"most closed among the G-7 countries." 

   Finally, there is the issue of Japanese business practices, 
specifically "keiretsu."  The government's basic policy in dealing 
with issues such as "keiretsu," according to Hatakeyama, is that it 
will issue "proper orders" to eliminate any antitrust violations, 
and it will create "appropriate" measures to stop any anti- 
competitive business practices which come to light.  He did not 
specify what such "appropriate" measures might be or how rigorously 
he expected the Japanese Government to enforce them. 

   Hatakeyama noted that U.S. "bureaucrats," scholars, and 
businessmen commonly point out that Japan's business practices have 
led to the closed nature of its markets.  He countered that the 
United States also engages in some "closed" business practices, or 
practices which favor certain U.S. products.  As an example, he 
noted that U.S automakers are manufacturing 70 percent of their auto 
parts within the United States and that this constitutes an unfair 
exclusion of foreign parts, which, he continued, has led Japanese 
steelmakers to avoid tie-ups with U.S. automakers. 

   The U.S. perception that Japan's market is "closed," Hatakeyama 
maintained, stems from Washington's failure to take account of 
global competitiveness.  One example of this, he wrote, is 
manifested in the U.S. argument that the Japanese market is closed 
because the United States holds a 54 percent share of the world 
semiconductor market, excluding Japan, but only a 20 percent of the 
Japanese market.  These numbers are correct, noted Hatakeyama, but 
the U.S. share of Japan's semiconductor market is so small only 
because Japan has strong, highly competitive companies in its own 
domestic market, "not because the Japanese market is closed."  In 
fact, Hatakeyama maintained, the U.S. domestic semiconductor market 
is very similar to Japan's because even though Japan holds a 54 
percent share of the global market, excluding the United States, it 
has only a 20 percent share of the U.S. market precisely because of 
the presence of strong, highly competitive U.S. companies. 
   Hatakeyama also attempted to refute the notion that Japan's weak 
import ratio is a reflection of its structurally closed nature.  He 
claims that Japan's import ratio of manufactured goods to GNP of 3.2 
percent in FY92-- a low figure when compared to the U.S. ratio of 
6.9 percent in FY91--occurred "because Japanese companies and 
products are globally competitive," not because Japanese markets are 
closed.  He pointed out that in 1975, when many U.S. companies 
prided themselves on their global competitiveness, the U.S. import 
ratio was only 3.4 percent, up from a mere 3.0 percent in the early 
1970's. 

   Recommendations for Dealing With United States - Hatakeyama 
concluded his article by offering six "recommendations" for Japan in 
its dealings with the United States: 

   1. Japan must make efforts to persuade the U.S. Government that 
its markets are open and regulation-free.  The Japanese side "must 
specify which market" when referring to "market-opening measures" so 
it does not cause confusion "about opening the manufactured goods 
market, which is already open."  Japan should also implement import- 
expansion measures, such as streamlining import procedures, 
especially in the auto sector. However, it should be prudent and not 
encourage the notion that this is a "cure-all" measure. 

   2. Japan should initiate deregulation measures to spur import- 
expansion efforts. 

   3. A U.S.-Japan comparative study on "keiretsu and other 
traditional Japanese and U.S. business practices" should be 
conducted "immediately" and principles governing the control of 
these practices should be drafted and then enforced by the 
governments. 

   4. Japan must continue to firmly object to "microeconomic 
numerical targets."  Since Japan has "agreed" to objective criteria, 
it must also accept the fact that import expansion efforts hereafter 
will be measured by trade "statistics." 

   5. Japan must firmly object to "macroeconomic numerical targets." 
Since Japan will be working toward "a significant medium-term 
reduction in its current accounts surplus,"--he did not indicate how 
this would be accomplished--it must publicize the fact that it will 
continue this year's income tax reduction "next year and beyond," 
and must decide on a large increase in its 10-year 430 trillion yen 
($4 trillion) public investment program. 

   6. If the United States undertakes unilateral measures based on 
Super 301, the framework talks should be called off and Japan should 
file an appeal to the GATT.  If the United States appeals to GATT 
that Japan's trade policies "invalidate GATT partner-country 
rights," Japan should stress that it has been "playing fair and 
square." 

   FEATURE:  New MOFA Deputy Minister for Economic Affairs - 
SUMMARY:  Sadayuki Hayashi, the newly appointed deputy minister for 
economic affairs in the Ministry of Foreign Affairs (MOFA), 
considers Japan-U.S. relations as part of Japan's global 
relationship and will try to resolve trade problems through the 
General Agreement on Tariff and Trade (GATT) instead of through 
bilateral negotiations, according to press reports.  He does not see 
any prospect for a compromise on numerical targets in trade 
negotiations between Japan and the United States, and is uncertain 
about the future of the Japan-U.S. framework talks. 

   Hayashi, who was appointed MOFA's new deputy minister for 
economic affairs on 11 March, and who will serve as Japan's "sherpa" 
for the Naples G-7 Summit and as co-chairmen of the Japan-U.S. 
framework talks, appears to be a member of MOFA's mainstream group, 
the "multilateralist faction," according to an exclusive interview 
with Hayashi published in the 24 March HOKKAIDO SHIMBUN.  MOFA's 
"multilateralists" consider the Japan-U.S. relationship to be part 
of Japan's larger global relationship and advocate trying to resolve 
Japan-U.S. trade problems at the GATT instead of through bilateral 
negotiations, the paper notes. 

   Replying to an interview question concerning the breakdown of the 
Japan-U.S. framework talks, Hayashi states that what Japan must do 
now is to "ensure transparency of the Japanese market through 
deregulation" and to "harmonize the Japanese market with world 
trade."  He also states that Japan has informed the United States 
that it "will not negotiate under the threat of Super 301," and this 
position of Japan "will not change."  "If the United States takes 
unilateral actions based on Super 301," Hayashi continues, Japan 
will ask the GATT to "judge whether U.S. actions are right" and 
"clarify any Japanese violation that the United States cites as a 
basis for imposing a Super 301 action." 

   In the interview Hayashi comments that he sees "no prospect" for 
a compromise on numerical targets in various industries because the 
United States "has not changed its position" concerning such targets 
and Japan "cannot accept them."  Instead, he states, the government, 
"under the direction of Prime Minister Morihiro Hosokawa, is 
formulating voluntary measures," which will include deregulation and 
market-opening steps in "the three priority areas" of government 
procurement, automobiles and auto parts, and insurance.  Although 
Japan will try to come up with "as many measures as possible," 
Hayashi states, macroeconomic measures "will be difficult to include 
in the package."  He says he understands that microeconomic measures 
alone cannot reduce Japan's current account surplus.  Macroeconomic 
measures are important in reducing Japan's trade surplus, but "the 
United States must understand that there are various limitations" 
which preclude the Japanese Government from including macroeconomic 
measures in its March package of trade measures. 

   Comments on Framework Talks, Numerical Targets - Although he 
hopes Japan's package of deregulation measures and market opening 
steps will lead to reopening the Japan-U.S. framework talks, he is 
"not so certain" of their outcome.  In Hayashi's view, the United 
States has not decided what to do after Japan announces its package 
of measures, and therefore he does not expect to see "where the 
framework talks are heading" until after a meeting between Foreign 
Minister Tsutomu Hata and U.S. Trade Representative Mickey Kantor, 
which is planned for mid-April. 

   Replying to a HOKKAIDO SHIMBUN question concerning government 
guarantees of "numerical targets initiated by the private sector," 
Hayashi comments that he understands the United States considers the 
cellular telephone issue a success because it has established a 
"precedent" for such a process.  "The government can use the 
Telecommunications Law to regulate cellular telephones to a certain 
degree, but automobiles and auto parts are totally different--they 
are free."  Regarding government procurement, an area where the 
United States asserts that the Japanese Government can achieve 
numerical targets, he states that the government's intention is to 
introduce an "open, competitive bidding system" for goods and 
services above a certain value, instead of "ambiguous, 
discretionary" contracts. 

   Hayashi's Earlier Comments on Japan-U.S. Negotiations - Hayashi 
expressed similar views concerning Japan-U.S. trade issues when he 
was a negotiator in the Structural Impediments Initiative (SSI) 
talks as director general of MOFA's Economic Affairs Bureau.  In 
comments published in the 28 August 1989 NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI), he stated that trade talks betwen the two countries 
require "two-way efforts"--Japan should do what it must, "but the 
United States also should do its part."  He stated that "the best 
and only answer for the Japan-U.S. trade imbalance is that Japan 
should expand domestic demand, promote structural adjustments, and 
open the Japanese market, while the United States should reduce its 
fiscal deficit and strengthen its manufacturing capabilities." 
Hayashi also said that while Japan needs to increase imports, "at 
the same time the United States needs to make efforts to increase 
its exports." 

   Concerning U.S. complaints over trade matters, Hayashi stated 
that Japan is willing to listen to American complaints, but the 
United States "also has to correct its misunderstandings" of the 
Japanese market, according to the 4 September 1989 NIKKEI.  Also, 
regarding the issue of structural change, in the 28 August 1989 
NIKKEI Hayashi stated that "the economic structure of one country 
will not easily change, because economic structural problems are 
deeply related to a country's society, culture, and sense of 
values."  Further, he asserted it would be "difficult to quantify 
structural change." 

   MITI To Simplify Export Controls on Strategic Commodities - On 1 
April the Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) will 
begin simplifying its export controls on strategic commodities, such 
as machine tools, carbon fibers, super alloys, and materials which 
could be used in the manufacture of missiles and nuclear, 
biological, or chemical weapons.  The new "comprehensive 
authorization system" will provide for granting comprehensive three- 
year authorizations for exports to countries for which there is 
little fear of diversion to third countries, and which participate 
in international export control regimes, such as the the Chemical 
Weapon Commodities Diversion Control Committee, also known as the 
Australia Group.  Authority to handle license applications for 
exports to these countries will be transferred to MITI's regional 
bureaus by this autumn.  Export licenses for exports to subsidiary 
companies of Australia Group member countries outside of Europe and 
the United States will be effective for two years. 

   The new system is expected to reduce the number of export license 
applications by about 60 percent, a number that has grown from under 
20,000 in 1991 to 80,000 in 1993.  It will also lighten the 
administrative burden on exporting companies, which in some cases 
have had to apply for multiple export licenses for a single export 
contract.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 11 Mar 94 p 5) 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Financial Institutions Expanding 
Asian Operations -- SUMMARY:  Japanese financial institutions are 
establishing a stronger presence in Asia's securities and bond 
markets, according to press reports.  Banks and securities firms are 
bolstering their Asian operations through subsidiaries and 
affiliates, particularly in Hong Kong and Singapore, and they are 
aggressively pursuing stock and bond underwriting activities. 

   According to a report released on 4 March 1994 by the Ministry of 
Finance concerning the "disposition of foreign securities 
investments," Japanese investors became net purchasers of Asian 
securities in 1993, according to the 5 March NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
(NIKKEI).  Net purchases have increased as Japan's securities firms 
have aggressively promoted stock investment in the region, 
particularly in Hong Kong and Singapore.  By establishing 
subsidiaries and enhancing their Asian operations, Japanese 
financial firms have forged a strong presence in Asian markets, the 
paper noted.  According to press reporting, Japanese banks and 
securities have taken the following steps to bolster their Asian 
operations: 

   Daiwa Securities--Daiwa Investment Trust and Management Co. will 
establish a Singapore corporation, Daiwa Investment Advisors 
(Singapore) on 1 April, to enhance its portfolio management 
capability concerning Asian stocks, according to the 8 March NIKKEI 
KINYU SHIMBUN.  Daiwa has a Hong Kong subsidiary, but has decided to 
complement it with a Singapore office so as to respond to the 
expanding demand and diversified needs of investors in Asian stocks. 
The Singapore firm, which will be capitalized at about $1.24 
million, will cover the equity markets in Thailand, Malaysia, 
Indonesia, and India, leaving Daiwa's Hong Kong affiliate to cover 
the Hong Kong, Taiwan, and South Korea markets. 

   Mitsubishi Bank is also enhancing its Asian stock-trading 
operations as part of its plan to become a "major player in Asia's 
stock markets," according to the 25 February NIKKEI KINYU.  It has 
begun a survey of Asia's equity markets, their legal systems, and 
trading volumes to determine whether there is sufficient demand to 
warrant acquiring seats on all Asian stock exchanges in addition to 
Hong Kong, where it already has a seat. 

   NIKKEI KINYU reports that the number of employees at Worldsec, 
Mitsubishi's Hong Kong affiliate, which focuses on Asian equity 
investment and underwriting, recently doubled compared to the number 
of employees in 1991, when Worldsec was established.  Worldsec's 
profits in FY93 "nearly tripled" compared to FY92.  Worldsec already 
has a London-based affiliate and is preparing to establish a 
marketing affiliate in New York sometime in 1994 to sell Asian 
stocks to U.S. investors.  In addition, Mitsubishi this year expects 
to receive Japanese Ministry of Finance authorization to establish a 
domestic securities subsidiary, which will pave the way for 
Mitsubishi to trade stocks "trilaterally" between Asia, Europe, and 
the United States. 

   Nomura Securities--Ace Securities, a comprehensive securities 
firm belonging to the Nomura Group, dispatched a study group of 
young employees to Asia in March 1994 to enhance its understanding 
of Asia's stock markets, according to the 18 March NIKKEI KINYU. 
The group planned to travel to high-growth regions such as Hong 
Kong, Shanghai, and Shenzhen and to gather information from Japanese 
companies operating in China.  Ace believes that the information 
gathered concerning local corporations and economic trends will lead 
to "a stronger Asian investment trust business." 

   Fuji Bank is increasing capital investment in its Hong Kong 
securities affiliate from HK$293 million ($38.05 million) to HK$450 
million ($58.44 million), according to the 23 March NIKKEI.  Like 
Mitsubishi, Fuji is bolstering its Asian securities trading and 
underwriting operations with an eye toward establishing a domestic 
securities subsidiary in November 1994. 

   Firms Placing Special Emphasis on Derivatives Operations - Major 
commercial banks are bolstering their derivatives operations in Asia 
by establishing companies in Hong Kong specializing in currency and 
interest rate swaps and options, according to the 23 March NIKKEI. 
The banks are expanding their Asian derivative operations in 
response to the growing need among Japanese companies operating in 
Asia as well as governments and corporations for currency exchange 
facilities and more stabilized interest rates. 

   DKB Financial Products HK, which was recently established by a 
U.S. affiliate of Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank, is scheduled to begin 
operations in Hong Kong in late March and will focus on derivative 
products, according to NIKKEI.  Sakura Bank will establish a company 
in Hong Kong sometime in 1994 to specialize in derivatives, 
according to the 29 March NIKKEI KINYU.  A Sakura official explains 
that the bank plans "to move its cutting-edge talent developed in 
the U.S. and European markets to Asia."  Fuji Bank is also 
considering establishing a subsidiary or branch in Hong Kong to 
focus on derivatives, and is presently deciding on the timing and 
amount of capital to be invested in the new operation, according to 
the 23 March NIKKEI.  Sanwa Bank is doubling the number of personnel 
at the Hong Kong branch established by its U.S. affiliate in the 
fall of 1993. 

   Recent Underwriting Activities in Hong Kong - The Bank of Tokyo 
is seeking to capture more bond underwriting positions in Hong Kong, 
anticipating that the "listing boom" for Hong Kong companies that 
began last year will continue in 1994, according to the 9 March 
NIKKEI KINYU.  The bank has underwritten three of the fifteen new 
listings to date this year on the Hong Kong exchange, and on 18 
March its Hong Kong affiliate, Bank of Tokyo International (HK), 
will underwrite a new listing of $HK240 million ($31.2 million) for 
the firm Cheung Tai Hong Holdings. 

   Nomura's Hong Kong subsidiary, Nomura International (HK), will be 
the lead underwriter for the new listing of Daiwa Associates 
scheduled for mid-April, according to the 23 March NIKKEI KINYU. 
Daiwa, which manufactures and markets electronic parts, will raise 
HK$58.5 million ($7.6 million) by issuing 50,000 shares.  This will 
be the sixth new listing for Nomura in 1994, and the second in which 
it has been the lead underwriter. 

   Fuji Bank's Hong Kong subsidiary, Fuji International Finance 
(HK), recently agreed to co-lead a bond underwriting for the Hong 
Kong affiliate of a China's state-run foreign investment firm, China 
International Trust and Investment Corporation, according to the 2 
March NIKKEI KINYU.  The total value of the issue will be HK$500 
million ($64.94 million).  The Hong Kong affiliates of Sanwa, 
Mitsubishi, and Sakura will also be among the lead underwriters. 

   MOF Interim Report on Financial Institution Disclosure - The 
"Working Subcommittee on Financial Institution Disclosure" under the 
Financial System Research Committee, a private advisory panel to the 
Ministry of Finance (MOF), on 25 March published an interim report 
on financial disclosure issues, according to the 25 March NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI).  The report proposes that information on 
the performance of bank security and trust subsidiaries and "the 
overall risk management systems of banks" be disclosed through 
improved "disclosure publications." Whether foreign subsidiaries of 
Japanese banks must disclose off-balance sheet transactions, an 
issue the subcommittee had intended to address in March, has been 
deferred for future consideration, NIKKEI noted.  (For an earlier 
article on the disclosure issue, see Pacific Rim Economic Review, 
Vol 3, No 5, 9 March 1994.) 

   Securities and Trust Subsidiaries - Under the financial system 
reforms enacted last year, banks are now allowed to establish trust 
and securities subsidiaries.  The report pointed out that the nature 
and format of subsidiary businesses differ so vastly that a single, 
simplified disclosure vehicle by a bank is necessary for its 
depositors to be "aware of the bank's management and business 
strategy," according to the 26 March NIKKEI. 

   Based on the subcommittee's report, the Federation of Bankers 
Associations of Japan will revise and make specific its standards 
for disclosure.  Under the Banking Act, private banks are required 
to provide annual public disclosures based on the Federation's 
rules.  The disclosure documents are to be readily accessible to 
depositors and those doing business with a bank. 

   The new disclosure policy, which will take effect in March 1994, 
will have an immediate impact on six banks, according to the 26 
March SANKEI SHIMBUN.  The securities subsidiaries of the Industrial 
Bank of Japan, Long-Term Credit Bank of Japan, Mitsubishi Trust, 
Sumitomo Trust, and the Central Bank for Agriculture and Forestry, 
as well as the trust subsidiary of the Bank of Tokyo, will be 
obliged to disclose new information.  Commercial banks planning to 
establish securities subsidiaries in FY94 will have to make such 
disclosures in March 1995. 

   Risk Management Reporting Requirements - The new standards, the 
25 March NIKKEI reported, "go a step further" than existing rules in 
addressing risk management operations at the parent bank.  According 
to the 30 March NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN, in the past, banks publicized 
their approaches to asset and liability management "at their 
discretion," but under the new rules "they will be required to do 
so."  In addition, the 25 March NIKKEI reported, a bank's method of 
oversight and supervision of interest rate and credit risk--newly 
identified as among those risks a financial institution holds--must 
be disclosed as well.  However, the SANKEI article pointed out that 
the subcommittee report does not specify what calculation methods 
should be used to determine such risk.  Indices for assessing 
business management, such as ordinary profits and deposit-loan 
balances, will be unchanged, but now banks will be required to make 
such disclosures for five consecutive fiscal years rather than two 
years as in the past. 

   Off-Balance-Sheet Transactions - In April the subcommittee will 
establish a special group devoted to the issue of disclosure of so- 
called "off-balance sheet" transactions, including interest rate 
futures and currency swaps, according to the 26 March NIKKEI. 
Currently no figures appear on a financial institution's balance 
sheet for these transactions, and their true nature "tends to elude 
transparency."  Moreover, these transactions are conducive to large- 
volume trading across national boundaries and have been expanding at 
the overseas affiliates of Japanese financial institutions, 
according to the 24 February NIKKEI KINYU.  The subcommittee met in 
March to consider the issue of disclosing off-balance sheet 
transactions, specifically whether foreign subsidiaries of financial 
institutions will be required to disclose information.  However, the 
29 March NIKKEI reported that the subcommittee is still studying the 
issue and will take the next year to compile a report listing 
disclosure requirements. 

   Taiwan Authorizes Securities Firms To Establish, Upgrade Offices 
- Taiwan's Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) has authorized 
three additional Japanese securities companies to establish 
representative offices in Taipei, according to the 25 March NIKKEI 
KINYU SHIMBUN.  The three companies are Wako Securities, in which 
the Industrial Bank of Japan (IBJ) is the largest shareholder; New 
Japan Securities, the fifth largest securities company in Japan, 
which is also affiliated with the IBJ; and Sanyo Securities, a 
comprehensive securities firm associated with Nomura Securities. 

   The paper notes that the three companies applied to the Taiwan 
SEC in 1992, along with Japan's "big four" securities firms--Nomura, 
Daiwa, Nikko and Yamaichi--but approval of the three smaller 
companies' applications was postponed.  In mid-1993 the "big four" 
firms were granted permission to set up offices under the "principal 
of mutuality," and Taiwan's major securities firms opened offices in 
Tokyo at the same time the "big four" opened their offices in 
Taipei.  In the case of Wako, New Japan, and Sanyo, apparently there 
was no mutuality involved, and the SEC is thought to have granted 
them permission to operate in Taiwan as part of Taipei's efforts to 
enlist Japan's support for its admission to the General Agreement on 
Tariffs and Trade (GATT). 
   Meanwhile, the "big four" securities companies that already have 
representative offices in Taipei are considering upgrading their 
offices to full branch offices, according to the 30 March NIKKEI 
KINYU SHIMBUN.  As part of its overall liberalization of financial 
markets, at the end of January the SEC reduced from two years to one 
the period required for a foreign securities firm to wait before 
upgrading a representative office to a branch office.  The Japanese 
firms are expected to apply to Japan's Ministry of Finance (MOF) for 
permission to upgrade their offices in mid-April and then apply to 
Taiwan's SEC in June or July.  On 31 March the SEC will provide a 
detailed explanation of application procedures to foreign securities 
firms eligible to upgrade their offices.  As in the case with the 
three smaller securities firms, "insiders" say the speedy 
authorization is part of Taiwan's attempt to enlist the Japan's 
support for early GATT admission. 

   Since the issue of Japanese securities firms establishing branch 
offices in Taiwan "complicates" Japan's policy toward China, the 
paper reports, MOF personnel visited Beijing in February 1994 to 
discuss the Taiwan branch office issue.  On 10 March the Japan 
Securities Dealers Association designated China's Shanghai stock 
exchange a "designated foreign securities exchange."  In return, the 
MOF obtained the Chinese authorities' "consent" on upgrading the 
Taipei representative offices. 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  Japanese Firms Setting Up 
Operations in Shenzhen - Marubeni Construction Material Lease 
(MCML), Japan's leading construction equipment leasing company, in 
conjunction with its parent, Marubeni Corp. and Marubeni Hong Kong 
Ltd., in April will establish a joint venture construction equipment 
leasing company in Shenzhen.  The new company, Marubeni Construction 
Material Culin Co. Ltd., will lease temporary construction 
equipment, such as scaffolding and retaining walls, to companies 
working on Hong Kong's new airport and related highway and subway 
construction.  The joint venture company will be capitalized at 300 
million yen ($2.86 million), with MCML investing 60 percent, the 
parent, Marubeni Corp. 30 percent, and Marubeni Hong Kong 10 
percent.  Total investment will be about 700 million yen ($6.67 
million).  Sales are expected to be 550 million yen ($5.2 million) 
in its first fiscal year and 1.3 billion yen ($12.4 million) within 
three years.  The venture's head office and factory will be located 
in the Futian bonded zone in Shenzhen, where MCML has already 
purchased a 13,000 square-meter site. 

   This will be MCML's fourth overseas joint venture, following 
those undertaken with Marubeni Corp. and local companies in 
Singapore, Malaysia, and Thailand. (Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 23 
Feb 94 p 5) 

   Sanyo Seimitsu, a wholly owned subsidiary of Sanyo Electric, will 
begin manufacturing small motors for cameras and office equipment in 
April at a recently completed plant in Shenzhen.  Sanyo Seimitsu has 
invested about 250 million yen ($2.38 million) in the 3,000-square- 
meter plant, which will employ 400 to 500 workers.  The plant will 
boost Sanyo Seimitsu's overseas production of motors to 2.5 million 
per month.  It also produces 1 million motors per month in Japan. 
(Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 2 Mar 94 p 9) 

   Futaba Corp., a major manufacturer of metal molds, has begun 
shifting production of molds out of Hong Kong to Shenzhen because of 
Hong Kong's rising land and labor costs.  A Futaba subsidiary, 
Futaba Hong Kong, will invest HK$20 million ($2.6 million), the 
entire amount of capitalization, in Futaba Precision Mold (Shenzhen) 
Co. Ltd.  The plant will be completed in 1994 and is scheduled to 
begin operations in early 1995.  Futaba Precision Mold (Shenzhen) 
will import metal plates from its South Korean subsidiary, Hanguk 
Futaba Precision Industry, and will assemble finished molds.  Twenty 
percent of the output will be sold in China and 80 percent in Hong 
Kong.  This will be the fifth overseas production and sales base 
involving Futaba's metal mold business. (Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
9 Mar 94 p 12) 

   Mitsui Hi-tec has bought a factory in Shenzhen to manufacture 
molds and electric motor cores.  Details concerning the factory have 
not been disclosed, but it is estimated that total investment will 
be about 1 billion yen ($9.5 million).  It will begin operations in 
July and its output will be sold to Japanese, European, and American 
electronics and semiconductor manufacturers in China.  Mitsui Hi-tec 
is also searching for a plant site in Shanghai, which will also cost 
about 1 billion yen, to manufacture molds and motor cores.  This is 
a change from the company's original plan, which was to produce 
integrated circuit lead frames. (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 28 Mar 
94 p 9) 

   Olympus Optical Co., has completed construction of a new camera 
plant in Shenzhen, and on 10 March began full-scale operations.  The 
20,000 square-meter plant, which will employ about 950 workers, has 
a monthly production capacity of 100,000 compact cameras.  This is 
Olympus' third, and largest, overseas camera plant, and it will 
double Olympus' overseas production to 3 million cameras next year 
and raise its overseas production ratio to 50 percent. 

   Rather than following the usual practice of beginning production 
with simple assembly operations, Olympus decided to establish a 
"coherent production structure" from the start, included lens 
polishing and plastic parts molding processes.  In 1995 the plant 
will also begin producing microcassette tape recorders.  (Tokyo 
NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 10 Mar 94 p 11) 

   Mitsubishi Warehouse and Transportation will expand its 
transportation network in China and Southeast Asia by opening a 
representative office in Shenzhen in March, opening an office in 
Vietnam in April, and upgrading its Shanghai representative office 
to a local corporation in FY95 (which begins on 1 April).  The 
Shenzhen representative office will be set up as a branch of the 
Hong Kong transportation company Hong Kong Daia Transportation.  It 
will handle imports to southern China via Hong Kong and will assume 
responsibility for products exported from the region by Japanese 
companies.  The Shanghai representative office will be upgraded to a 
local corporation and will serve Japanese companies in the Shanghai 
area by conducting market surveys on commodities and warehouse site 
surveys. 

   In addition to opening an office in Vietnam, probably in Ho Chi 
Minh City, Mitsubishi Warehouse also plans to establish 
representative offices in Jakarta and in Guangzhou, Shanghai, and 
Beijing, in addition to setting up local corporations in Singapore, 
Hong Kong, Thailand, Taiwan, and Indonesia.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 17 Mar 94 p 22) 

   Chisso Engineering, Nichimen Win Petrochemical Plant Contract - 
Chisso Engineering, a major plant engineering firm, and Nichimen, a 
general trading company, have won a $45 million contract from the 
China National Chemical Construction Corp. to build a vinyl chloride 
monomer (VCM) and polyvinyl chloride (PVC) manufacturing plant for 
the Tianjin Dagu Chemical Factory.  The plant, which is scheduled to 
be completed by June 1997, will have an annual production capacity 
of 80,000 tons of VCM and 20,000 tons of PVC.  It will incorporate 
Chisso's technology for separating VCM from PVC and will also 
incorporate VCM processing technology from the Belgian firm European 
Vinyl Corp.  Construction of this plant "represents a shift for 
China to ethylene-based VCM."  Production from the plant will 
replace that from an existing Tianjin Dagu acetylene-based VCM 
plant, which will be scrapped. 

   Chisso's plant construction experience in China and Nichimen's 
ability to obtain a dollar-denominated loan from the Japan Export- 
Import Bank were significant factors in winning the contract. 
(Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 12 Mar 94 p 6) 

   EASTERN EUROPE:  Marubeni To Expand Sales Networks in Poland, 
Hungary, Russia - Marubeni, one of Japan's largest general trading 
companies, is establishing marketing firms in the former socialist 
states of Eastern Europe to increase sales of office and electronic 
equipment.  To protect itself against the appreciating yen and 
because Marubeni anticipates future growth despite turbulent 
transitions to market economies in Eastern Europe and Russia, the 
company has decided to establish sales bases there "early on" to 
take advantage of market developments. 

   Marubeni's first move will be in Poland, where it will set up a 
marketing firm for office equipment in April through a joint venture 
with the Polish firm Faxon.  The joint venture company will be 
capitalized at 83 million yen ($790,000), with Marubeni contributing 
42 percent and Faxon 58 percent.  Its sales target for the first 
year of operation is 2 billion yen ($19 million) from sales of 
equipment such as photocopiers, facsimile machines, printers, and 
personal computers. 

   Also in July 1994, Marubeni will establish a wholly-owned 
subsidiary to market electronic equipment in Russia.  Its base of 
operations will be in Moscow, from which the subsidiary will sell 
products wholesale to regional dealers.  It sales goal is 6 billion 
yen ($57 million) for office equipment and electronics for the first 
fiscal year. 

   In Hungary, Marubeni will establish a wholly owned subsidiary by 
the end of 1994 to market advanced medical equipment.  It expects 
sales of 1 billion yen ($9.5 million) during the first fiscal year. 
(Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 15 Mar 94 p 12) 

   NORTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Political Figures 'Scheming' To Revive 
Trade With Pyongyang -- SUMMARY:  Despite the slowdown in Japanese 
trade with North Korea, some Japanese political figures are 
scheming" to resume trade with North Korea, according to press 
reports.  A political associate of Japan Renewal Party (Shinseito) 
Diet Member Hajime Ishii reportedly will visit Pyongyang in April to 
establish a new company that will resume exports of river sand and 
gravel to Japan that stopped after the fall from power of former LDP 
kingmaker Shin Kanemaru, who backed closer Japan-DPRK ties.  Foreign 
Minister Tsutomu Hata apparently is being "targeted" by North Korea 
to be a "mediator" between Japan and North Korea--the role Kanemaru 
had played earlier. 

   An article in the 14 March NIKKEI BUSINESS reports that despite 
the slowdown in Japanese trade with North Korea due to North Korea's 
accumulated debts to Japan and U.S. criticism of funds sent by 
General Association of Korean Residents in Japan (Chosen Soren) 
members to Pyongyang, supporters of closer economic ties between 
Japan and North Korea are "scheming to resume trade" with North 
Korea.  The article reports that one such supporter of closer DPRK- 
Japan economic ties is Yoshiyuki Oe, who is an associate of Diet 
member Ishii and chairman of the Japan-North Korea Friendship 
Document Center.  The article states that Oe will visit North Korea 
in April to discuss with his North Korean counterparts establishing 
a new company that will "resume" exports of river sand and gravel to 
Japan.  Oe is chairman of the Kanto Region Support Society (Koenkai) 
for Diet member Ishii, who is himself chairman of the Japan-North 
Korea Parliamentary League. 

   In addition to Oe's prospective visit to North Korea, the NIKKEI 
BUSINESS article reports that a "considerable" amount of additional 
activity related to resumption of the sand and gravel trade also 
appears to be going on "below the surface."  Anticipating that 
Japan's domestic supply of river sand and gravel suitable for use in 
cement will be exhausted in the future, and in view of an expected 
increase in public works projects in Japan, "even large trading 
firms which now hesitate to conduct business openly with North 
Korea" are reportedly eager to conclude deals with North Korea to 
import sand and gravel.  As one example of this interest, the NIKKEI 
BUSINESS article reports that a Japanese trading firm has conducted 
a study on the sand and gravel situation in North Korea through a 
"dummy company." 

   By way of background, NIKKEI BUSINESS reports that Japanese 
imports of North Korean river sand and gravel began in 1990 when the 
LDP's Kanemaru, visited Pyongyang.  According to NIKKEI BUSINESS, 
when the imports of North Korean sand and gravel began, Kanemaru 
asked the large general construction firms to buy the North Korean 
materials.  An official of the construction firm that participated 
in building the Akashi Bridge, one of Japan's longest, stated that 
"North Korean sand and gravel was relatively expensive, but we could 
not ignore" Kanemaru's request.  When Kanemaru lost power in the 
summer of 1991, however, construction firms stopped buying the North 
Korean materials. 

   Foreign Minister Hata Targeted as 'Mediator' - According to an 
article in the December 1993 issue of SENTAKU, a monthly magazine, 
North Korea appears to be "targeting" Foreign Minister Tsutomu Hata 
as the "replacement" for Kanemaru as political and economic mediator 
between Japan and North Korea.  The SENTAKU article reports that 
officials of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs (MOFA) assigned to the 
office of Foreign Minister Hata--who is also the head of Shinseito- 
-commented that the number of local assemblymen and officials of 
various organizations coming to petition Hata to promote Japan-North 
Korean relations "has suddenly increased." 

   The SENTAKU article also reports that Shingo Kanemaru, the second 
son of Shin Kanemaru, "is orchestrating from behind the scenes" 
efforts to resume trade with North Korea.  It asserts that Pyongyang 
had instructed Chosen Soren "to promote Japan-North Korean trade." 
Chosen Soren's local branches, in turn, have reportedly asked local 
assemblymen and officials of various local organizations to support 
Chosen Soren's efforts.  With letters of introduction from Shingo 
Kanemaru addressed to the foreign minister, local assemblymen and 
organization officials reportedly went to MOFA, requested to see 
Hata, and "directly petitioned him to promote Japan-North Korean 
trade." 

   According to SENTAKU, Shingo Kanemaru hopes to play a major role 
in the Japan-North Korea trade "after the Japanese general public 
forgets the scandal involving his father."  Until then, "he appears 
to be using Foreign Minister Hata" to promote relations between the 
two countries. 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA:  Activities of Machine Tool, Industrial Machinery 
Firms - Matsuura Machinery, a leading manufacturer of machining 
centers based in Fukui Prefecture, plans to increase its sales 
efforts in Southeast Asia.  To do this, the firm will create a 
position within its International Division responsible for Southeast 
Asia, and in April it will send two or three managers to Southeast 
Asia to begin sales activities.  It will also create a Singapore- 
based network of sales agent offices.  Matsuura is making this move 
because its primary customers, Japan's electrical machinery 
manufacturers, are shifting their production bases to Southeast 
Asia.  Matsuura has exported over 5,500 machining centers to the 
United States, but it has sold less than 30 in Southeast Asia.  It 
plans to increase sales in Southeast Asia to the level of more than 
one machining center per month.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 15 Mar 
94 p 11) 

   Aoyagi Seisakujo, a manufacturer of metal working machinery based 
in Fukuoka Prefecture, will export a numerically controlled 
stainless steel V-groove fluting machine to a Malaysian metalworking 
company through the Taiwanese trading company Kuanshi Maoyi.  Aoyagi 
has sold similar kinds of specialized machinery to Taiwanese 
metalworking companies, but this is its first export to Malaysia. 
Aoyagi plans to use Kuanshi Maoyi to increase its sales in Southeast 
Asia and China.  (Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 7 Mar 94 p 23) 

   Maruka Machinery Co., a construction machinery manufacturer 
located in Osaka, will expand its overseas operations by 
establishing local corporations and branch offices in Taiwan, 
Thailand, Malaysia, the Philippines, and Indonesia, and by 
establishing an Asia Office within its Overseas Headquarters. 
Maruka is also studying expansion into China, where it is currently 
negotiating a sale of ten pieces of construction machinery.  (Tokyo 
NIKAAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 11 Mar 94 p 11) 

   VIETNAM:  Firms Expanding Offices, Forming Investment Plans - 
According to figures compiled by the Japan External Trade 
Organization (JETRO), some 80 to 85 Japanese companies have opened 
offices in either Ho Chi Minh City or Hanoi, the 15 March NIHON 
KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reports.  Among the major firms that have 
recently opened offices in Vietnam are Honda Motor, Yamaha Motor, 
and Mitsubishi Heavy Industries. 

   Honda opened a three-man office in Ho Chi Minh City in early 
March, according to the 15 March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  The manager 
is a branch-level Honda official, who is assisted by two Vietnamese 
employees.  The office will undertake basic market studies with the 
goal of establishing a motorcycle sales network in Vietnam.  In 
1993, 200,000 motorcycles were sold in the country, a total "nearly 
triple" that of 1992.  NIKKEI SANGYO notes that Honda motorcycles 
account for "nearly 90 percent" of all sales. 

   Yamaha Motor, the world's second largest motorcycle manufacturer 
after Honda, opened a Ho Chi Minh City office in January 1994, the 
NIKKEI SANGYO article reports. 

   Mitsubishi Heavy Industries (MHI), Japan's largest manufacturer 
of heavy equipment, has received Vietnamese Government approval to 
open an office in Ho Chi Minh City, according to the 15 March 
NIKKEI.  It will be staffed by one MHI official and three Vietnamese 
employees.  MHI is participating in "extensive business talks" 
concerning construction of power generating plants and petroleum and 
natural gas processing facilities.  NIKKEI notes that MHI also plans 
to develop markets for injection molding equipment, construction 
machinery, and air conditioners.  Another goal is to investigate the 
market for supplying materials. 

   Paper Firm, Nissho Iwai in Joint-Venture Forestry Project - New 
Oji Paper, Japan's largest paper manufacturer, and the general 
trading company Nissho Iwai have formed a joint venture forestry 
development company in Vietnam that will eventually export all the 
wood chips it produces to New Oji's paper manufacturing operations 
in Japan.  The companies established the joint venture in response 
to a request from Vietnam's Forestry Ministry.  The project will be 
the first forestry project in Vietnam to be 100 percent funded by 
Japanese companies. 
   The goal of the two firms is to start up operations of the new 
company--which will probably be named "Dong Phu Plantation Forestry 
Company of Vietnam"--in Ho Chi Minh City in October 1994.  Initial 
investment is planned to be $300,000, but will increase each year 
for 6 years to a total of $1.8 million.  The investment ratio will 
be 51 percent for New Oji and 49 percent for Nissho Iwai. 

   The new company's forestry plantation will be located in Dong Phu 
District of Song Be Province, and steps currently are being taken to 
acquire the necessary land.  Beginning in FY95, 1,500 hectares 
(3,700 acres) of acacia, eucalyptus, and other fast-growing trees 
will be planted each year.  After 6 years the total plantation area, 
including irrigation facilities, will reach 13,000 hectares (32,100 
acres).  Harvesting will be undertaken on a 6-year cycle and will 
begin in the year 2001 at an annual rate of 65,000 tons, with New 
Oji taking all the chip output.  Total plantation costs are 
projected to be 600 million yen ($5.7 million). 

   Since wood chips produced in Japan are no longer price 
competitive, New Oji annually must import about 60 percent, or 2.7 
million tons, of its chips from abroad.  Because of tighter 
restrictions on logging in the United States, New Oji decided to 
proceed with forestry operations in Vietnam to diversify and 
stabilize its sources of raw materials.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
17 Mar 94 p 14) 

   Association Studying Private Funding for Agricultural Projects - 
The Overseas Agricultural Development Association (OADA), a Japanese 
industry association (shadan hojin), is taking steps to help Vietnam 
develop its agricultural sector through private Japanese investment, 
according to the 8 March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  With the assistance 
of local Vietnamese governmental officials, the OADA has compiled a 
list of 98 projects totaling $380 million that could be funded by 
Japanese companies, some of which involve the modernization of 
facilities and expanding areas of cultivation. 

   According to NIKKEI SANGYO, the OADA sent a survey group to 
assess Vietnam's agriculture and livestock sectors and their future 
growth potential.  The OADA also reportedly plans to assist Japanese 
companies in their "push into Vietnam's agricultural sector" by 
providing advice and "acting as a go-between."  The OADA is 
compiling a report entitled "Potentialities for Private-Sector 
Investment in Vietnam's Agricultural Sector," and is also 
considering providing detailed information on Vietnam's agricultural 
development to Japanese companies. 

   Among the 98 development projects on OADA's list, 16 involve the 
processing of crops such as mangoes, oranges, and coconuts, at a 
total cost of $23 million; 13 are upland farming projects, that 
include the cultivation of sugarcane and tobacco, totaling $34 
million; 11 projects involve coffee cultivation and processing, 
totaling $47 million; and 10 involve the cultivation of eucalyptus 
and other trees and processing the wood into chips, tota1ing $33 
million.  The remaining projects cover a number of areas, from 
banana, pineapple, tea, and rubber production to sericulture and pig 
raising. 

   The NIKKEI SANGYO article did not mention which government 
ministry the OADA is affiliated with.  However, a 26 September 1989 
NIKKEI SANGYO article stated that OADA is "an auxiliary organization 
under the Ministry of Agriculture, Forestry and Fisheries and the 
Foreign Ministry" that operates "jointly" with Japanese companies. 
The 8 March 1994 NIKKEI SANGYO reports that the president of the 
OADA is Eiichi Hashimoto, an advisor to Mitsui and Co.  According to 
the "Nikkei Who's Who" reference feature of the Nikkei Telecom 
database, Hashimoto is also an advisor to Mitsui Construction, a 
Mitsui Group company.  In 1983 he was chairman of Keidanren's 
Indonesia Cooperation Committee, according to the 15 April 1983 
NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN. 

   Japan-U.S. Trade Issues - Reaction of Glass Industry to U.S. 
Super 301 Decision -- In an article in the 16 March NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN, reporter Ryoichi Hatta writes that the U.S. Government's 
"strong pressure" on Japan's glass distributors to open the glass 
market could have an "adverse effect" on sales of U.S. glass in 
Japan.  Hatta reports that some glass wholesalers were "angered" 
when the U.S. Government selected glass as one industry to which it 
will apply trade sanctions under the reinstated "Super 301" trade 
provisions.  The U.S. attitude is "totally impolite" to customers, 
Japanese glass wholesalers say.  "The more political pressure that 
is applied, the less we become eager to handle U.S. glass." 

   Hatta maintains that Japan's glass market "is no longer closed," 
and that pressure by Japanese glass manufacturers on their keiretsu 
glass wholesalers to handle only glass products made by specific 
keiretsu manufacturers "is no longer observed."  A wholesaler who 
started handling glass made by the U.S. firm PPG Industries a year 
ago is quoted as saying that there is "no problem for Japanese glass 
wholesalers, even those belonging to the keiretsu of a certain glass 
manufacturer, in handling foreign glass." 

   Hatta also points to efforts by the U.S. glass industry to 
increase sales in Japan.  PPG has been steadily increasing the 
number of Japanese companies that handle its products.  Also, U.S. 
Guardian Industries, which formerly was the "severest critic" of the 
Japanese glass market, now ships glass products on specially 
designed steel pallets that are suitable for distribution in Japan. 

   Hatta reports that recently more U.S. glass manufacturers have 
contacted Japanese glass wholesalers.  Up until this year, however, 
"U.S. glass manufacturers have not tried to sell their products to 
Japanese wholesalers."  He notes that according to a survey 
conducted in December 1993 by the Ministry of International Trade 
and Industry, 70 percent of Japan's 380 glass wholesalers responded 
that they had never been contacted by a foreign glass manufacturer. 
Machine Tools/Robotics - Fanuc, Yamazaki Conclude Agreements With 
Chinese Firms -- Fanuc, a leading machine tools company and 
industrial robot manufacturer, has signed a contract with the 
Nanjing Machine Tool Factory to supply it with Fanuc's wire 
electrical discharge machine technology.  Nanjing Machine Tool will 
both display and begin taking orders for wire electrical discharge 
machines at the upcoming machine tools exhibition in Beijing.  By 
providing wire electrical discharge machine technology to the 
Nanjing firm, Fanuc will be creating a customer for the numerically 
controlled equipment produced by Fanuc's own Beijing joint venture 
company, Beijing Fanuc Electromechanics Co. Ltd.  This joint venture 
was formed in December 1992 with the Beijing Machine Tool Research 
Institute to manufacture numerically controlled equipment for 
China's machine tool market. 

   Fanuc will also begin importing cast parts for industrial robots 
from Nanjing Machine Tool Factory to lower its manufacturing costs. 
Currently, Fanuc uses about 400 tons of cast parts per month, half 
of which are imported from South Korea.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
25 Mar 94 p 12) 

   Fanuc has also signed a contract to supply carbon dioxide lasers 
on an original equipment manufacture basis to the Hangzhou Forging 
Press Factory based in Hangzhou, Jiangsu Province.  The contract 
calls for Fanuc to supply computer numerically controlled equipment, 
servomotors, and laser oscillators for a 2-kw laser to Hangzhou 
Forging Press, which will use the equipment and lasers to develop a 
laser cutting machine.  Hangzhou Forging Press will display a laser 
cutting machine at the upcoming Beijing machine tool exhibition. 
The first parts have already been shipped and Fanuc technicians are 
installing the equipment.  Fanuc projects that laser sales in China 
will reach a level of about 30 per month.  (Tokyo NIKAAN KOGYO 
SHIMBUN 8 Mar 94 p 12) 

   Yamazaki Giken, a machine tools company, will establish a joint 
venture sales company with the Northwest Light Industrial Institute, 
located in Shaanxi Province, to market its newest computer 
numerically controlled milling machines in China.  Yamazaki chose 
the institute as its joint-venture partner "because it already 
manufactures and sells industrial machinery."  In the joint 
venture's first fiscal year, Yamazaki plans to export about 30 
milling machines. The company will ship to China and display at the 
Beijing machine tools exhibition one of its YZ-8CR milling machines 
which it developed in April 1993.  Currently, Yamazaki has no 
personnel permanently assigned to China, but given the institute's 
own technical expertise, Yamazaki believes it can respond adequately 
to maintenance requests by sending technicians to China for short 
periods.  Previously Yamazaki has not sold any milling machines in 
China.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 25 Mar 94 p 11) 

   Star Micronics To Close Eight European Sales Companies - Star 
Micronics, a machine tool and printer manufacturer, will close eight 
of its European sales companies in FY94 because of the prolonged 
recession in Europe.  Star will incur 2 billion yen ($19 million) in 
extraordinary losses with the closure of two machine tool sales 
companies in Switzerland and six printer sales companies in Germany, 
France, the Netherlands, and Belgium. 

   Star will record 1.4 billion yen ($13.3 million) in 
nonconsolidated final losses and 2 billion yen ($19 million) in 
consolidated final losses for FY93, the first time in the company's 
history that it has recorded either consolidated or nonconsolidated 
losses.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 5 Mar 94 p 6) 

   Telecommunications/Satellites - Mitsubishi Electric Initiates 
Multimedia Equipment Business Activities -- Mitsubishi Electric Co. 
(MELCO) will inaugurate a "multimedia promotion project group" on 1 
April and will also soon begin full-fledged multimedia equipment 
business activities, focusing on personal digital assistant 
equipment and two-way cable television (CATV) equipment.  The 
company will establish a 20-member project team, which will create a 
unified business structure for managing the equipment business in 
Japan and the United States and a research and development team of 
about 100, to work on developing the equipment at its research 
centers in Japan.  Yoshito Yamaguchi, director of MELCO's main 
office for overseas business, will be the primary executive officer, 
while Shoichi Iikawa, chairman of the Personal Information Equipment 
Research and Development Center, will be the "group leader."  The 
project team will be staffed by about 12 employees from the 
company's overseas business office and research centers, and about 
six employees from its U.S. affiliate, Mitsubishi Electric America. 

   MELCO will pursue a strategy of linking up with U.S. computer 
manufacturers and CATV companies in developing its personal digital 
assistant and CATV equipment businesses.  The project team will 
manage activities such as designing the cooperative structures, 
customer development, product design, and drafting business proposal 
plans.  The company is aiming for a quick startup by pooling its 
strengths, and will gradually work toward commercialization of its 
products. 

   To date MELCO has taken a cautious approach to developing 
multimedia equipment for the general public because of the 
opaqueness" of the market, and has instead focused its efforts on 
developing specialized equipment and technologies, such as image 
compression.  However, the company decided to begin "full-fledged" 
multimedia efforts because, in the words of MELCO President Takashi 
Kitaoka, "the U.S. market is about five years ahead of the Japanese 
market, and if we get a late start in the U.S. market, we will have 
difficulty starting up in the Japanese market."  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 28 Mar 94 p 1) 

   MPT To Deliberate on Digital Communications Satellite 
Broadcasting - In April the Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications 
(MPT) will begin deliberations on switching from analog to digital 
systems for communications satellite television broadcasting 
services, such as CNN and MTV.  In considering the switch to digital 
systems, the MPT first is seeking the more effective use of 
satellite transponders.  Currently with analog systems, a 
communications satellite transponder can handle only one channel, 
but it can relay four to eight channels if digital transmission 
systems are used.  Consequently, according to executives of major 
trading companies, communications satellite broadcasting companies 
will be able to reduce their operating costs considerably by 
converting to digital systems, which in turn will lead to a lowering 
of viewer subscription fees "by about 60 to 70 percent." 

   Secondly, the MPT is seeking to enhance the "operational 
foundations" of communications satellite broadcasting companies.  In 
the United States, beginning in April a Hughes Company subsidiary 
will begin offering "Direc TV," a multichannel digital 
communications satellite broadcasting service.  To benefit from 
similar services in Japan, the communications industry must 
establish technical standards to properly equip the communications 
satellite broadcasting stations and develop the appropriate hardware 
for receiving broadcasts.  The MPT plans to turn over discussion of 
the necessary technical standards to its Telecommunications 
Technology Council as early as next year if the switch to digital 
systems receives support from relevant industry circles.  (Tokyo 
SANKEI SHIMBUN 8 Mar 94 p 1) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - Machine-Building Industry 
Formulates Development Plan -- The Ministry of Machine-Building 
Industry has formulated a new program: "A Pillar Industry--National 
Program To Develop the Machine-Building Industry."  The program 
includes long-term objectives, thoughts on reform, planned measures, 
and concrete steps to vigorously develop machine-building into a 
pillar industry. 

   The 19 March issue of Beijing JIDIAN RIBAO provides an outline of 
the plan. 

   Objective:  By the year 2010 to turn machine-building into a 
pillar industry of the national economy.  By 2010 to increase the 
ratio of gross value of industrial output, value-added, and foreign 
exchange earnings from the present 23 percent, 6.8 percent, and 14 
percent of GNP to over 30 percent, 8 percent, and 25 percent 
respectively.  The target for foreign exchange earned from exports 
will be $130 billion. 

   Two Stages: Prior to the year 2000 the first stage will be to 
build a good foundation, improve product quality, and adjust the 
product mix.  The machine-building industry will meet domestic 
demand for electric power equipment and modern farming equipment and 
will supply most of the equipment needs of the metallurgy, mineral, 
petroleum, and coal industries.  The second stage from 2000 to 2010 
will focus on meeting the domestic demands of the energy, 
transportation, raw material, and auto industries.  Product 
performance will reach international standards. 
   Three Features:  The formulation and implementation of this plan 
differs from past plans in three ways: 

   1.  Continued reform of the economic system will promote the 
formation of a market economy.  Micromanagement and direct control 
will weaken.  Enterprise success or failure will depend on their own 
efforts. 

   2.  Reorganization of the international industrial structure, 
division of labor, and joining GATT will accelerate the merger of 
China's machine-building industry with the international market. The 
sharing of markets, resources, and new technical achievements will 
provide the industry with motive and opportunity. 

   3.  The pattern of ownership has changed from the single public 
ownership of the past to the coexistence of state-owned, collective, 
joint ventures, and private economies.  The rapid development of 
rural enterprises and joint ventures has become a major force in 
developing the machine-building industry, and will guide and advance 
management and macroeconomic regulation throughout the industry. 

   Four Focal Points: 1.  To emphasize production of basic 
machinery. In this century, the machine-building industry will meet 
over 90 percent of the heavy equipment manufacturers' demand for 
processing facilities and wi1l meet 60 percent of auto industry's 
demand for processing equipment. 

   2.  To emphasize production of basic parts.  This century the 
machine-building industry will focus on production of hydraulic, 
pneumatic, seals, bearings, low pressure parts, and instrument 
parts. By 2010 the quality, reliability, and durability of these 
parts will be guaranteed. 

   3.  To emphasize production of heavy equipment.  In the area of 
thermal power equipment, the focus will be on developing 300,000 to 
600,000 kilowatt generating units, and developing new technology on 
fluidized beds, combined cycle, and clean combustion.  In the area 
of hydropower equipment, the emphasis will be on developing large 
generating units, pumped storage, and tubular turbines. 

   4.  To focus on the auto industry.  By the year 2000, the 
machine-building industry will set up six or seven enterprise groups 
that have large economies of scale and the ability to compete 
internationally.  Production will meet domestic demand.  By the year 
2010, the machine-building industry will set up a large enterprise 
group capable of producing 1 million vehicles and a enterprise group 
specializing in the production of spare parts. 

   Five Strategies: 1.  To promote development through competition. 
The government will rely on policies, plans, information, and other 
measures to develop, cultivate, and perfect markets, and to create a 
fair competitive environment.  To improve competitiveness, measures 
will be formulated to aid industries and products that fail in the 
market. 

   2.  To help the four focal points succeed.  Allocation of people, 
funds, and material will be made for the production of basic 
machinery, basic parts, heavy equipment, and the auto industry. 

   3.  To rely on scientific and technical progress. The industry 
will accelerate the transfer of scientific results to production, 
use new technology to raise product quality, and pay attention to 
training. 

   4.  To promote economies of scale. To improve efficiency, goods 
that lend themselves to mass production will be produced based on 
market demand and economies of scale.  Enterprise groups will be 
developed to promote specialization. 

   5.  To strengthen external and internal cooperation. The industry 
will accelerate the import of foreign resources, talent and funds to 
raise the domestic technological level.  The industry will support 
lateral associations that are transsectoral, transregional, and 
involve multiple trade areas, and will develop international markets 
to expand exports. 

   Six Measures: 1.  To implement a modern enterprise system.  The 
machine-building industry will gradually transform large and medium 
state-owned enterprises into corporations and stock companies.  The 
government will issue and market stocks and bonds for key 
enterprises.  Large enterprise groups will be set up that are 
transsectoral, transregional, and involve multiple trade areas, and 
that pool production, technology, trade, and finances.  Small state- 
owned enterprises will implement the contracting, leasing, or share 
cooperation systems.  Some will be sold to collectives or 
individuals. 

   2.  Reform plans to improve macroeconomic regulation and control. 
The tradition of distributing money, materials, and projects to 
enterprises will change to providing forecasts, guidance, and 
services.  There will be a comprehensive plan for all trades and key 
projects.  The government will give priority funding to projects 
listed in the plan. 

   3.  Emphasize the development of S and T ability to promote S and 
T progress.  Industry will integrate scientific research and 
production.  Research institutes and enterprises will be encouraged 
to form lateral associations or set up enterprise groups. 
Enterprises will set up R and D centers. 

   4.  Improve policy guidance to promote industry development.  The 
machine-building industry will formulate and implement policies on 
upgrading technical equipment and formulate standards for major 
machine-building products and spare parts.  The industry will be 
involved in decisions on the import of technical equipment. 

   5.  Focus on the cultivation of talent to improve labor quality. 
The industry will improve conditions in technical schools and 
enterprise worker training facilities to foster entrepreneurs with 
initiative who understand business operations and management.  The 
industry will formulate occupational qualification and employment 
standards, publicly advertise for workers, and promote labor 
mobi1ity. 

   6.  Raise funds from many channels to increase investment.  The 
government will develop a bank investment policy to support the 
development of the machine-building industry. The government will 
give priority to the funding of technology imports, and joint 
ventures, and to expanding exports.  All banking and nonbanking 
financial organizations will provide strong support. 

   Article Examines Regional Disparities of Rural Enterprises - 
There are noticeable disparities between rural enterprises in the 
coastal regions and in the central-western regions.  Rural 
enterprises in central-western regions are of a much smaller scale 
than enterprises in the eastern coastal regions, although the total 
number of enterprises are close.  For example, at the end of 1992 in 
the central-western provinces of Hubei, Sichuan, Guizhou, Yunnan, 
and Gansu the average number of enterprises was 977,800 while in the 
eastern coastal regions of Jiangsu, Zhejiang, Fujian, Shandong, and 
Guangdong the average number was 987,600.  However, the average 
total number of employees in the central-western regions was 
3,398,600, while it was 7,447,600 in the coastal regions.  The 
differences are also obvious in terms of fixed assets and value of 
output.  Enterprise fixed assets averaged 6.495 billion yuan in the 
central-western regions, and 25.324 billion yuan in the coastal 
regions.  The gross output value of central-western rural 
enterprises was 176.94 billion yuan, and 852.63 billion yuan in 
coastal regions. 

   Economic efficiency of central-western rural enterprises is also 
lower than that of coastal enterprises.  In 1991 average labor 
productivity was 8,671 yuan with 100 yuan of fixed assets yielding 
200 yuan of output value, and 13 yuan of profit taxes.  In contrast, 
the average labor productivity of coastal rural enterprises was 
15,951 yuan, with 100 yuan of fixed assets yielding 287 yuan of 
output value, and 22 yuan of profit taxes. 

   The reasons for these disparities between the enterprises are: 

   1.  Traditional modes of thinking remain strong in the western- 
central provinces.  The thinking on rural enterprise development 
remains at the stage of using local resources, and processing and 
selling goods locally.  Industrial development is thought to be an 
urban affair beyond the peasants ability to manage.  When selecting 
projects the inhabitants of the central-western provinces tend to 
stick to the old ways, and do things simply with a minimal amount of 
resources.  Leadership and coordination are weak.  Especially in the 
last few years, many cadre who are old, weak, sick, or disabled have 
occupied leading positions in the central-western rural enterprises. 

   2.  The natural environment limits rural enterprise development. 
Central-western regions consist of plateaus, mountains, gullys, and 
basins.  As a result, highway, railroad, aviation, and communication 
construction tends to be slow, and facilities are backward. 

   3.  There is a shortage of talent, and this results in the 
technical content of products being low.  For example, 1,480,000 
employees of rural enterprises in Hubei have only a junior middle 
school education, 480,000 employees have a high school education, 
and just 5,300 employees have a college education, accounting for 
73.19 percent, 23.76 percent, and 0.26 percent respectively of all 
employees.  It is difficult for employees with low educational 
levels to understand advanced technical products.  They can only 
produce low-grade products that have a small market.  In 1992 the 
value of Hubei rural enterprise exports was 1.342 billion yuan, 
Sichuan 1.140 billion yuan, Guizhou 97,830,000 yuan, Yunnan 
159,870,000 yuan, Gansu 106 million yuan, accounting for 2.94 
percent, 1.2 percent, 1.28 percent, 1.49 percent, and 0.96 percent 
respectively of gross output value of rural enterprises.  In 
Shandong rural enterprises the export value accounted for 4.25 
percent of gross output value, Jiangsu 13.32 percent, Zhejiang 10.66 
percent, Fujian 17.02 percent, and Guangdong 7.33 percent. 

   4.  Insufficient funds restrict central-western rural enterprise 
development.  According to 1990 statistics, construction projects in 
the central-western regions totaled just 7,895, while there were 
37,836 in the eastern coastal regions.  Investment in the central- 
western regions was 1,515,210,000 yuan compared to 11,504,360,000 
yuan in the coastal regions. 

   To reduce these disparities, east-west cooperation must be 
improved.  Central-western regions have abundant natural resources, 
minerals, raw materials, energy, and labor.  If combined with the 
technology, talent and funds in the east, the superior central- 
western resources can be transformed into product superiority.  The 
State Council must adapt measures to support development of central- 
western rural enterprises.  Local governments simply lack the 
necessary funds to make substantial changes within three to five 
years. (Chongqing XINAN JINGJI RIBAO 25 Feb 94 p 3) 

   Bank of China Registers Increase in Renminbi Savings Deposits - 
Following an increase of nearly 4 billion yuan in January, the Bank 
of China's renminbi savings deposits increased by 8.32 billion yuan 
in February, 2.3 times higher than the same period last year.  In 
the short span of two months, the net increase of renminbi savings 
deposits at the Bank of China was over 12 billion yuan, 4.66 billion 
yuan higher than the same period last year.  The total balance of 
savings deposits is now more than 120 billion yuan.  (Beijing 
ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0630 GMT 17 Mar 94) 

   Official Says New Tax Laws Discourage Taiwan Investment - 
According to Ting Chieh-en, president of the Hong Kong-Taiwan Trade 
Promotion Association, most of the new investment projects set up in 
mainland China by Taiwanese businessmen in recent years have been 
affected by the new tax system introduced in the mainland and 
investment enthusiasm has dropped.  He also stated that Taiwanese 
businessmen will take a wait-and-see attitude toward their mainland 
investment projects, at least in the first half of this year.  (Hong 
Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1005 GMT 14 Mar 94) 

   Guangzhou To Build International Airport, Invites Foreign 
Investment - Guangzhou has announced plans to build a new 
international airport to replace the outdated and overcrowded Baiyun 
Airport and has said that it will allow heavy foreign participation 
in the project.  The authorities have estimated that 10 billion 
renminbi will be required for the project, of which 60 to 70 percent 
will come from foreign sources.  A company will be set up to build 
the airport and will be listed on either the Shenzhen or Shanghai 
stock markets, which are China's two official stock markets. 
Approximately 10,000 rural residents now occupy the proposed site in 
Huadu, and farmers will be compensated for the land used to build 
the airport and will be given an opportunity to buy shares in the 
airport company.  Construction of the new airport will begin later 
this year and will be completed in 1996.  The airport will have four 
runways and a multi-purpose airport complex zone.  It will be linked 
to the Guangzhou metropolitan area, which lies 28 km to the south, 
by three highways and an electric railway.  Guangzhou Mayor Li Ziliu 
said that the new airport is not intended to compete with Hong 
Kong's Chek Lap Kok Airport, due to be completed in 1997.  After the 
new airport is built, Baiyun Airport will be made into a commercial 
exhibition center.  (Hong Kong EASTERN EXPRESS 25 Mar 94 p 8) 

   Guangzhou To Sell State Enterprises to Foreigners - On 10 March, 
Guangzhou Vice Mayors Chen Kaizhi and Wu Liang announced at a news 
conference that the city will stop giving loans to money-losing 
state enterprises but will "concede the market, profits, and shares" 
to foreign businessmen.  Be it a new enterprise, a profit-making 
enterprise, or an old enterprise in good condition, they said, 
shares must be offered to foreigners, who are even welcome to buy an 
entire factory.  Some tertiary industries, commercial businesses, 
retail shops, food services, tunnels, and bridges must also be sold 
in a planned and controlled manner.  Vice Mayor Wu said that the 
money raised by selling shares will be diverted to urgent 
construction projects in Guangzhou, such as the subway and road 
construction projects.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 10 Mar 94 p 7) 

   Guangdong To Invest 630 Mi1lion Yuan To Develop Port Projects - 
Guangdong plans to invest 630 million yuan to develop 11 key port 
projects this year, including the new Gongbei Immigration and Custom 
Building in Zhuhai, the Yangjiang port, the Nanao port, the second 
phase of the enlargement project in Wenjindu, Shenzhen, the second 
phase of the Huanggang Port living quarters project, the Meilin and 
Tongle checkpoints, and the immigration and customs facilities of 
Qingyuan, Heyuan, and Huizhou.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0758 
GMT 12 Mar 94) 

   Guangdong To Invest 12 Billion Yuan in Transportation - Li Peiwu, 
director of the Guangdong Transportation Department, announced on 10 
March that the province will spend 12 billion yuan on transportation 
projects this year.  The money will be used to build 140 km of 
expressways, 1,300 km of second-class roads, 3,000 km of county 
roads, and 27 vehicle stations, as well as the 23 berths which are 
already under construction.  Among the key projects are Humen 
Bridge, Shantou Bay Bridge, Zhuhai's Qiao Bridge, Shenzhen-Shantou 
Expressway, Guangzhou-Zhuhai East Expressway, the Dali-Sanshui 
Section of State Expressway 321, and the navigational channel 
reaching out to sea from Yamen. (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 10 Mar 94 p 
7) 

   Hainan's Yuangpu Port Planning Major Expansion - The Hainan 
Provincial Government is planning to invest in Yangpu Port in the 
Yangpu Economic Development Zone to expand its shipping capacity. 
The port currently has two deep-water berths with an annual handling 
capacity of 1 million tons.  The expansion plans call for building 
three more deep-water berths, two with a 200,0O0-ton capacity, and 
adapting the wharf to accommodate containers.  Last year, Yangpu 
Port handled 510,000 tons of cargo, which is expected to increase to 
2.8 mil1ion tons after the expansion project is completed next year 
and reach 6 million by the year 2000.  The project will cost 
approximately 588 million yuan ($68 million).  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 
(BUSINESS WEEKLY) 27 Mar-2 Apr p 5) 

   Fujian Aquatic Products Industry Reports Rising Growth - Since 
1991, the average annual growth of the output of the aquatic 
products industry of Fujian Province has been nearly 20 percent. 
Last year this industry reaped another bumper harvest, with a total 
output volume of more than 1.9 million tons.  Fujian's per-capita 
aquatic products possession volume has reached 60.5 kg.  Fujian has 
a total of 52,000 sea water net cages for breeding more than 10 
kinds of fish, including porgy, garoupa, yellow croaker, perch, 
b1ack porgy, and yellowtail.  The province has more than 20,000 mu 
of breeding bases for bullfrogs, soft-shelled turtle, and hairy 
crabs.  The annual output value of these products exceeds 3 billion 
yuan.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0630 GMT 17 Mar 94) 

   There are also 330 foreign-funded enterprises in Fujian's aquatic 
products industry, with a total investment of $250 million, of which 
$200 million is foreign capital.  Over one third of all these 
enterprises are funded by Taiwan investors.  Fujian has obtained 
World Bank loans worth more than $100 million for building export 
aquatic products bases.  The province has become China's biggest 
producer of eels and prawns.  The provincial authorities are 
encouraging foreign investors to invest in the province's fisheries, 
especially in the development of shallow waters and tidal areas, 
deep-sea fishing, and large fishery infrastructure projects. 
(Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1150 GMT 23 Mar 94) 

   Shandong's Retail Sales Grow Rapidly - According to the Shandong 
authorities, as of the end of 1993, there were 30 retail shops with 
sales exceeding 1 billion yuan each and 90 wholesale and open 
markets with transaction volumes exceeding 1 billion yuan each.  The 
30 retail shops' total sales were 5.94 billion yuan, representing 6 
percent of Shandong's total retail sales.  The 90 open markets' 
total transaction volume was 27.75 billion yuan, representing 28 
percent of the province's total retail sales.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO 
XINWEN SHE 0644 GMT 29 Mar 94) 

   Shenzhen Invests in Tourist Industry - In 1979, Shenzhen received 
1,000 overseas tourists; by 1992 the figure had skyrocketed to more 
than 2.2 million, more than any other tourist city in China. 
Tourism earned Shenzhen 2.1 billion yuan ($241 million) in foreign 
currency.  Tourism generated 3.8 billion yuan ($437 million), 17 
percent of the city's service business.  Tourist enterprises have 
fixed assets worth over 7 billion yuan ($805 million) and employ 
over 70,000 people.  The city is planning further investment in 
tourist facilities and new attractions, and, by the turn of the 
century, the city's target figure for overseas tourists will top 6.5 
million, representing an annual increase of 10 percent.  The 
authorities forecast foreign currency earnings from tourism of $1 
billion, an annual growth rate of 15 percent.  The city plans to 
finance its plans with foreign investment, which has accounted for 
25 percent of Shenzhen's total investment in tourism over the past 
12 years.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 27 Mar-2 Apr 94 p 
5) 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Cross-Strait Computer Industry 
Cooperation Thrives -- The hottest area for cross-Strait commercial 
cooperation so far is the computer field.  Cooperation has now been 
taking place for over two years and lately has garnered the most 
business attention and consumer interest.  In 1994, Taiwan and China 
will jointly develop Chinese language software on a full scale. 
In early January, representatives from the two sides met in 
Beijing to discuss the Chinese DOS operating system's application 
interface.  They reached some common understanding and decided to 
set up a standing committee whose purpose would be to unify the 
cross-Strait Chinese computer industries.  In late January, over a 
hundred people from both sides of the Strait participated in a 
second meeting in Beijing, exchanging information and discussing 
marketing strategies and how best to develop software and its 
applications. 

   Even more Taiwan-China computer programs are in the offing, 
either in the planning stage or in the course of development. 
Taiwan has already approved a new plan in which Acer Computers, 
whose computers are currently selling well in Taiwan, and Tai Ta 
Electronics will invest $510,000 and $4.9 million respectively in 
China.  Taiwan's Ta Chong computers continues to attract attention 
due to its superiority in computer modeling involving the fields of 
education, coal industry, light industry, meteorology, scientific 
research, agriculture, and physical education. 

   Taiwan's computer industry has recently expanded its market by 
investing in Beijing, Shanghai, Guangdong, Jiangsu and other cities. 
The intention is to eventually achieve full-scale cooperation with 
China so that the Chinese market will be dominated by indigenously 
produced computers.  That would change the current landscape in 
which giant foreign computer companies, such as Apple, Compaq, and 
IBM, dominate. 

   The idea of the cross-Strait computer software cooperation is 
reportedly to take advantage of the Chinese character software 
market that offers economies of scale and for China to take the 
leading role in the International Software Organization that 
establishes Chinese software standards.   The task of the moment 
facing both Taiwan and China is to set up cross-Strait information 
exchanges and communication standards, to further develop exchanges 
on the form in which the characters will be written, to standardize 
terminology, and to establish shareware scales and standards.  Both 
sides consider cooperation projects involving electronic financial 
systems, multilingual machine translation systems, multimedia 
technology, and applications as a priority.  (Shenzhen SHENZHEN TEQU 
BAO 1 Feb 94 p 5) 

   PRC, Vietnam Planning To Build Joint Border Economic Zone - Local 
officials recently indicated that China and Vietnam are planning to 
build a cross-border city at Dongxing in Guangxi, China and Mong Cai 
in Quang Ninh, Vietnam.  Most Dongxing residents speak Vietnamese 
and most Mong Cai residents speak Cantonese.  The Vietnamese 
Government will declare Mong Cai a free trade zone by the end of 
this year and will pour a huge amount of money into the zone to 
develop trade, tourism, and processing industries.  The Chinese 
Government declared Dongxing an open border town in 1992 and granted 
it many preferential policies.  The local Dongxing and Mong Cai 
governments are planning to hold a cross-border trade fair from 25 
April to 10 May.  Experts have also been invited to discuss the 
feasibility of building "a city administered by two countries." 
(Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 17 Mar 94 p A5) 

   Shanghai To Expand Opportunities for Foreign Investment - In 
order to attract more foreign investment, Shanghai plans to open ten 
major projects to foreign investors for construction and operation, 
including the Jinshan Power Plant, the Waigaoqiao Power Plant, the 
eighth-phase work on a heat and power plant, a second-phase railway 
project, the second international airport in Pudong, the Hongqiao 
Airport expansion, and the Sanlin Bridge. 

   This year's policy on the use of foreign capital will cover five 
points:  1. The industrial adjustment will take place with some 
major industrial items as the driving force.  Flexible measures will 
be adopted to deal with investment by multinational companies and 
technology in exchange for being allowed into the market and the 
setting up of shareholding companies.  2. The share by foreign 
investment in tertiary industry will be increased.  3. Foreign 
capital will be sought for construction of basic facilities in the 
urban area.  4. Administration of foreign investment will be 
properly handled in order to earn foreign exchange from exports.  5. 
Steps, including holding trade exhibitions will be taken in a bid to 
attract more foreign capital.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 1132 GMT 
23 Mar 94) 

   Tianjin Establishes Foreign-Funded Enterprises - Since the 
beginning of 1994, enterprises under the Tianjin Municipal First 
Commercial Bureau have received investments totalling $112 million 
from both domestic and foreign firms.  Of these investments, $60.64 
million came from foreign firms.  With the foreign capital, these 
enterprises have established 25 foreign-funded enterprises engaging 
in real estate development, the processing industry, the catering 
industry, and the recreation business.  (Tianjin City Radio 1000 GMT 
18 Mar 94) 

   Enterprises in Fujian's ROK-Sponsored Industrial Zone Begin 
Operation - The Jinjiang Donghaian Industrial Development Zone has 
taken shape with 17 enterprises, capable of generating 300 million 
yuan in total annual output value, already operating in the zone. 
The developer, the ROK Jinjiang Jintian Construction Company 
Limited, invested over 80 million yuan in infrastructure 
construction, equipping Donghaian with a major water, drainage, and 
sewage system, a power transmission-transformation station, and a 
program-controlled telephone system.  The 17 enterprises in the area 
are from Hong Kong, Macao, ROK, the Philippines, Australia, Britain, 
and some regions in China, including Heilongjiang and Shandong. 
Total investment is over $170 million.  Two garment companies began 
exporting their products to East Europe and South Africa last year. 
The developer plans to conduct a series of activities in the ROK, 
Australia, and Southeast Asia this year to attract more investment. 
(Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0805 GMT 25 Mar 94) 

   ROK's Samsung Group's China Trade To Increase in 1994 - The ROK 
electronics giant Samsung's total turnover is expected to reach $60 
billion in 1994, of which 2 percent comes from Hong Kong and Chinese 
markets.  The general manager of Samsung's Hong Kong office has 
predicted that the company's volume of business in the Chinese 
market will increase at an annual rate of 20 percent, at least in 
part thanks to the more stable exchange system that has resulted 
from the unification of the renminbi's exchange rates.  Current 
problems in this trade include obstacles to sales and circulation, 
such as the relatively high cost of transport.  (Hong Kong MING PAO 
16 Mar 94 p B2) 

   PRC, ROK To Jointly Build Large Oil Refinery in Shenzhen - ROK's 
Sunkyong Group will join the China National Petrochemical 
Corporation and the Shenzhen City Government in building an oil 
refinery in Shenzhen with a daily output of 100,000 barrels.  The 
three partners will make a joint investment of $1.5 billion, with 
the Sunkyong Group contributing 40 percent, 30 percent, and its two 
Chinese partners each contributing 30 percent.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI 
PO 13 Mar 94 p A2) 

   South Korean Electronics Firm To Produce TV Parts, VCR's - 
Goldstar, the South Korean electronics giant, signed a $19.5 million 
contract to produce VCR's and video cameras with the Shanghai Tape 
Recording Equipment Factory on 25 March.  The joint venture will 
lease 2,500 square meters of land in the Pudong Jinqiao Foreign 
Trade Processing Zone for the construction of its workshop, which is 
expected to take one and a half years.  Prior to the project's 
completion, the venture will rent workshop space in Pudong.  The 
factory's annual production capacity will be 300,000 VCR's and video 
cameras, of which 70 percent will be exported. 

   Goldstar also signed a contract with the Shuguang Electron 
Corporation in Hunan Province for a $140 million project to produce 
color television picture tubes and electron guns on 24 March in 
Beijing.  Goldstar will supply 51 percent of the capital for the 
joint venture.  The construction of the television parts plant will 
begin in Changsha in May.  When finished in 1996, the plant will 
have an annual production capacity of 8.5 million television picture 
tubes.  Half will be for the domestic market and the rest will be 
exported to southeast Asian countries and South Korea. 

   Goldstar plans to expand its production capacity as demand rises 
among Chinese consumers.  According to Goldstar's Beijing office, 
"The company will be setting up more joint ventures here, lured by 
the country's quality workforce and cheap labor costs."  (Beijing 
CHINA DAILY 26 Mar 94 p 2) 

   South Korean Company To Build Two Power Plants in Henan Province 
- The Dong-Ah Construction Industrial Co. of South Korea has been 
awarded contracts to build two power plants in Henan Province which 
will have a total capacity of over 300 megawatts.  The company will 
provide financing and will handle construction of the power plants 
at two different locations in the city of Xinxiang.  The firm signed 
agreements in Beijing last week with the Alanco Environmental 
Resources Corporation of the United States, the Xinxiang Heating 
Company of Henan, and several other Chinese firms.  Alanco will 
provide equipment and technology to remove particulates and sulphur 
dioxide, two major pollutants in the PRC.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 29 
Mar 94 p 2)  The first phase of the project will require an 
investment of $25 million.  Construction will begin this summer and 
is scheduled to be completed in 1996.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
0644 GMT 29 Mar 94) 

   South Korea Signs Telecommunications Joint Venture in Beijing - 
The Beijing Telecommunications Administration and the Kohap Group 
announced the formation of the Beijing-Kohap Integrated 
Telecommunications Equipment Company Limited, a new- and high- 
technology project, at a ceremony in Beijing on 28 March.  Each side 
has a 50 percent stake in the initial investment of $2.1 million. 
The project will introduce digital data over voice technology from 
the U.S. Integrated Network Corporation to produce universal data 
voice multiplexing (UDVM) equipment.  By installing UDVM equipment 
on a public telephone line, phone users will have easy access to 
public or private digital data networks such as Chinapac, the 
national public packet-switching data network.  The ceremony was 
attended by the ROK ministers of telecommunications, commerce and 
industry, and science and technology as well as Tian Jiyun, vice 
chairman of the National People's Congress, Beijing Vice Mayor Zhang 
Baifa, and Telecommunications Vice Minister Yang Xianzu.  (Beijing 
CHINA DAILY 29 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Israel To Set Up Aircraft Repair Joint Venture - The Israel-based 
RADA Electronics Industries Ltd. has signed a $13 million contract 
to set up an aircraft repair joint venture with the Beijing Tianzhu 
Forestry Development Company.  Under the deal, the Beijing TIRA 
Aircraft Components Services Co. Ltd. will supply the venture with 
spare parts, which currently must be ordered from abroad.  The joint 
venture will cover 4,600 square meters near Beijing's Capital 
Airport.  RADA will hold 80 percent of the investment, and the 
Beijing Tianzhu Forestry Development Company will hold the rest. 
The term of cooperation has been set at 30 years, and the venture is 
expected to go into operation next October.  The company is 
expecting a business volume of $10-15 million a year during the 
first three years of operations, after which the volume of sales may 
reach as much as $70-75 million annually.  The company will import 
aircraft components and smart cats automatic testing equipment from 
RADA's U.S. branch, which will be used primarily for testing and 
maintaining plane avionics.  (Beijing CHINA DAILY 21 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Sino-French Joint Venture Launched in Automobile Industry - The 
Sanjiang Renault Automobile Corporation, the largest joint venture 
launched in China's space industry, officially began operations on 
21 March.  The joint venture was established by China's Sanjiang 
Astronautics Industry Group and France's Renault Automobile Company 
with an initial investment of $100 million, of which Sanjiang 
contributed 55 percent.  The joint venture plans to produce 40,000 
luxury eight-seater vans in its first year, and annual output will 
increase to 165,000 by the year 2000.  (Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 
1312 GMT 21 Mar 94) 

   Italian Banking Group To Provide $75 Million in Export Credit 
Loans - The Industrial and Commercial Bank of China has signed an 
agreement with an Italian banking group for $75 million in export 
credit loans.  The three-member syndicate is led by the Crediop Bank 
of Italy and the 13-year loan will be used to support Chinese 
enterprises importing equipment and technology from that country. 
The loan is part of the bank's plan to strengthen cooperation with 
foreign banks in promoting foreign trade between Chinese and 
overseas enterprises in 1994.  The bank is trying to raise more 
foreign currency to finance China's development through medium-and 
long-term loans from foreign governments, overseas commercial banks, 
the World Bank, and the Asian Development Bank.  (Beijing CHINA 
DAILY 25 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Singapore Joint Venture To Produce Cigarette Paper in Hangzhou - 
The Singapore Overseas Development Company Ltd. and the Hangzhou 
Huafeng Paper Mill have established a $53 million joint venture with 
registered capital of $24.5 million.  The Hangzhou firm will provide 
35 percent of the total investment in the form of equipment and 
factory buildings, and the Singapore company will provide the 
balance in cash.  The Huafeng Paper Mill's main product is cigarette 
paper.  The joint venture plans to use French technology and 
equipment to raise annual output from 10,000 tons last year to 
15,000 tons next year, 10 percent of which will be sold overseas. 
(Beijing CHINA DAILY (BUSINESS WEEKLY) 27 Mar-2 Apr 94 p 2) 
   CITIC's Plans To Jointly Develop Zhejiang's Daxie Island - The 
China International Trade Investment Corporation's (CITIC) Daxie 
Development Company, will found the Xinde Company, a joint-venture 
with the United States' Packard Engineering Company in May this 
year.  This company will be responsible for project and investment 
management for Daxie Island, which is situated in Hangzhou Bay, east 
of Ningbo City in Zhejiang Province.  The two parent companies will 
share equally the capital stock.  This year, CITIC will invest 400 
million yuan in the island's development, which includes 
establishing a fixed crossing, a water and power supply systems, and 
a beltway and dismantling the existing facilities. 

   An $80 million project between CITIC and Greece's Athena Company 
is expected to get under way in October this year and will produce a 
bridge, a four-star hotel, and a 20,000- to 50,000-ton capacity 
pier.  CITIC will hold 30 percent of the shares.  CITIC plans to 
invest a total of 20 billion yuan over a 15-year period to develop 
the island into a large international port and foreign-oriented 
economic zone with a 41-berth container terminal, general cargo 
terminal, and oil terminal.  CITIC is now looking for partners in 
high- and new-technology projects, warehousing, transportation, 
processing, and banking and has made initial contacts with America's 
Caltex and Singapore's Esso.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 22 Mar 94 p 5) 

   Asian Investment Group Raises Funds To Invest in Auto Parts 
Industry - The Asian Strategic Investment Company (ASIMCO), formed 
by the Pacific Associated Group and two American financial 
institutions, Dean Witter and TCW, announced on 20 March that the 
company has raised $160 million for direct investment in China's 
auto parts industry.  So far, ASIMCO has chosen over 40 partners for 
cooperation, some of whom are promising manufacturers of pistons, 
clutches, gears, ignition coils, instruments, and starter motors. 
ASIMCO will invest over $160 million in 12 to 15 of China's auto 
parts factories over the coming six months and plans to invest 
another $1 billion over the next two years.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 
21 Mar 94 p 7) 

   Jiangsu's Nantong Port Becomes Major Import-Export Port - Last 
year, Nantong Port in Jiangsu handled over 13 million tonnes of 
freight, 15 percent more than the previous year.  A total of 46,500 
standard import and export containers passed through the port, 54.8 
percent higher than the previous year.  The port has become a major 
port for importing and exporting materials for the Changjiang 
valley. 

   In 1993, Nantong Port made great efforts in capital construction. 
The second phase construction project of the Langshan Port Area, 
involving a total investment of 250 million yuan, was completed. 
Three coal wharves with a capacity of over 10,000 tonnes each were 
put into operation, and six 2,000-ton berths were built on the Chang 
Jiang to serve these wharves, increasing their handling capacity by 
8.4 million tons.  In addition, 200 million yuan was invested in the 
construction of a container wharf and a multi-purpose wharf.  At the 
same time, 200 mu of land was allocated for a construction project 
funded by the Chinese side and the Hong Kong Henderson financial 
group to build a container transit center and a bonded warehouse to 
provide import and export services. 

   The Nantong Port currently has complete customs, industrial, and 
commercial offices, a foreign affairs office, a port administration 
authority, and other port management offices.  In the near future, 
the port's computer network, which handles most administrative 
tasks, will be linked with ports in other countries.  (Beijing 
ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0630 GMT 17 Mar 94) 

   Liaoning Attracted More Foreign Capital - Shenyang city in 
Liaoning Province has made a new breakthrough in utilizing foreign 
capital.  The number of new foreign-funded enterprises in 1993 
increased by 100 percent over the total for the past 10 years.  The 
city approved more than 1,120 projects utilizing foreign capital in 
1993, showing an increase of 60 percent over 1992, and about 60 
percent of the investments came from foreign firms.  Four ROK 
companies have invested more than $5 million in establishing plants 
in Shenyang, three of which have already begun production and have 
exported $5.65 million worth of products.  (Shenyang Liaoning Radio 
1000 GMT 28 Mar 94) 

   Taiwan:  Planning Council Says Annual Per-Capita Output Value 
Increases - The Council for Economic Planning and Development under 
the Ministry of Economic Affairs pointed out on 11 March that the 
annual per-capita output value of Taiwan's manufacturing industry 
has risen to NT$2.197 million ($84,500) from NT$1.416 million 
($54,460) in 1989, indicating that manufacturers have switched from 
the development of labor-intensive industries to technology- 
intensive ones.  (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PA0 12 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Executive Yuan Says Economy To Grow by 6.32 Percent This Year - 
Taiwan's economy is expected to grow 6.32 percent this year, the 
Executive Yuan told lawmakers at a meeting on 10 March.  According 
to the Executive Yuan, Taiwan ranked 20th in the world in 1993 with 
a GNP of $220.2 billion, while per-capita income was $10,566, 
ranking 25th.  Fueled by the upturn in the world economy, Taiwan's 
economic growth rate may reach 6.32 percent this year, higher than 
last year's rate of 5.74 percent.  (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO 11 Mar 
94 p 2) 

   Trade Board Says Benefits of GATT Entry Would Outweigh Losses - 
The Board of Foreign Trade has released a report on the effects of 
GATT entry on Taiwan's manufacturing industry.  According to the 
report, if tariffs are lowered by 10 percent, Taiwan's manufacturing 
industry will suffer a loss of NT$3.1 billion ($120 million), but 
the country's consumers will benefit by as much as NT$4.7 billion 
($180 million).  The board said that, with the exception of 
household appliances and automobiles, the economic benefits from 
Taiwan's GATT entry will outweigh economic losses.  (Taipei CHING 
CHI JIH PAO 10 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Directorate Announces Figures on Imports of Technology - The 
Directorate General of Budget, Accounting, and Statistics under the 
Executive Yuan said on 16 March that Taiwan's technological imports 
amounted to only $520 million in 1991, lower than South Korea's 
$1.18 billion, and far below the figures of other countries like the 
United States, Germany, and Japan.  The directorate noted that 
unwillingness by Taiwan manufacturers to import high technology will 
affect the pace of technological upgrading on the island.  (Taipei 
CHING CHI JIH PAO 17 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Ministry Draws Up Plan To Strengthen Economic Work in Southeast 
Asia - The Ministry of Economic Affairs and other relevant units 
have drawn up an outline to strengthen economic work in the 
Southeast Asian countries of the Philippines, Thailand, Malaysia, 
Indonesia, Singapore, Brunei, Vietnam, Laos, Cambodia, and Burma. 
The outline calls for actively expanding two-way trade and 
technological cooperation with Southeast Asian countries, helping 
Taiwan businesses to find production and marketing centers in the 
Southeast Asian region and expand economic activities there in order 
to reduce investment and trade overdependence on the PRC, enhancing 
Taiwan's relations with Southeast Asian countries, and striving to 
participate in the activities of economic organizations in the 
Southeast Asian region.  (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO 12 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Taipei's Exports to PRC Valued at $12.8 Billion in 1993 - 
According to statistics released by the Board of Foreign Trade, 
Taiwan's 1993 export value to the PRC totaled $12.8 billion, 
comprising 14.88 percent of the total export value--a sharp increase 
from 7.71-percent share in 1992.  This is the first time that Taiwan 
has included the value of cargo and goods transiting Hong Kong in 
its figures on exports to the PRC; hence the drastic increase in the 
export value to $12.8 billion, which is very close to the $12.9 
billion figure given by the PRC.  Economics Minister Chiang Ping-kun 
said that most exports to the PRC were capital goods such as raw 
materials and machinery.  (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO 18 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Taipei Lifts Ban on Textile Investments in PRC - The Industrial 
Development Bureau has initially decided to allow indirect 
investment in restricted textile items in the PRC.  The ban on 325 
textile items--including wool, cotton yarn, and cotton cloth made of 
synthetic fibers--will be lifted.  At the same time, indirect 
imports of most garment items will be allowed.  (Taipei CHING CHI 
JIH PAO 16 Mar 94 p 6) 

   Petroleum Company Plans To Build Industrial Zones in Indonesia, 
SRV - In response to the government's "southbound policy," the China 
Petroleum Corporation is considering moving its facilities overseas 
by building a petrochemical industrial zone in Indonesia and 
Vietnam, thus establishing a trade network there to help Taiwan 
businesses move into Southeast Asia.  Earlier this year, the company 
signed a $1.3 billion contract with Vietnam to build an oil refinery 
there.  (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO 21 Mar 94 p 6) 

Finance Minister Views Taxes, Investment With Indonesian Counterpart 
- Finance Minister Lin Chen-kuo held talks with his Indonesian 
counterpart Muhammad in Honolulu on 17 March.  During their talks, 
Indonesia promised to allow the establishment of Taiwan-invested 
banks, while Taiwan pledged to help promote Indonesian goods in 
Taiwan.  Lin Chen-kuo told Muhammad that Taiwanese enterprises had 
invested $4 billion in Indonesia.  Lin also said that if a treaty of 
mutual income tax exemption could be signed, more Taiwanese 
businesses would invest in Indonesia; Muhammad shared the same view. 
The second round of Taiwan-Indonesia negotiations on mutual 
exemption of income tax is slated for 8 April.  (Taipei CHING CHI 
JIH PAO 19 Mar 94 p 1) 

   Cabinet Views Cooperation With Thailand, Indonesia, the 
Philippines - Premier Lien Chan held a meeting on 9 March with Vice 
Premier Hsu Li-teh, Economic Minister Chiang Ping-kun, Foreign 
Minister Chien Fu, and other cabinet members to discuss proposals 
made during President Li Teng-hui's visits to Thailand, Indonesia, 
and the Philippines for cooperation and investment with these 
countries.  Programs considered included land development, 
agricultural cooperation, occupational training, the establishment 
of a Chinese school in Thailand, and investment in the 
petrochemical, sugar refining, and pharmaceutical industries. 
Taiwan will also seek to sign investment guarantee agreements with 
the three countries.  Premier Lien ordered the Research, 
Development, and Evaluation Commission to follow up on the 
implementation of these programs and present their findings to the 
president within three months.  (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PAO 10 Mar 94 
p 1) 

   Economic Minister Holds Forum With Electric Appliance Makers - At 
a forum with members of the Taiwan Electric Appliance Manufacturing 
Association on 16 March, Economic Minister Chiang Ping-kun confirmed 
that the division of work between industries on the two sides of the 
Taiwan Strait is conducive to increasing the competitiveness of 
Taiwanese goods. He promised to allow imports of more semi- 
manufactured goods and component parts from the PRC and to ease 
restrictions on visits by PRC businessmen.  Responding to 
suggestions for allowing direct cross-strait cargo shipments and 
setting up a cross-strait free trade zone, Chiang noted that the 
Ministry of Economic Affairs had drafted a program on shipping 
services between designated points on the two sides, but for 
political reasons it is not likely to be realized in the near 
future.  (Taipei CHING CHI JIH PA0 17 Mar 94 p 12) 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Increased ROK Trade, Investment in 
Vietnam Reported - SUMMARY:  Recent articles in the Vietnamese and 
South Korean press report on the development of and prospects for 
ROK trade and investment with Vietnam.  The Vietnamese sources point 
out that South Korea has "aggressively" increased its trade and 
investment in Vietnam in the past five years, more than doubling its 
investment there.  The South Korean press comments that the recent 
lifting of the U.S. trade embargo against Vietnam will remove 
barriers that have limited bilateral trade, allowing ROK investment 
to become even more "lively."  Both the Vietnamese and the ROK press 
list some of the current and future ROK projects in Vietnam. 

   Several articles in a special December 1993 issue of the Hanoi 
THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM reported an "explosion" of ROK trade and 
investment in Vietnam in recent years.  The paper noted that trade 
between the two countries increased 20-fold between 1988 ($23 
million) and 1992 ($500 million), and reached approximately $800 
million in 1993.  ROK investment increased from 17 licensed projects 
capitalized at $150 million five years ago, to 47 operating projects 
capitalized at $402.7 million in December 1993, making South Korea 
the fourth largest foreign investor in Vietnam.  The paper pointed 
out that 32 projects capitalized at $328 million were licensed in 
the first 11 months of 1993 alone.  The 23 February Seoul CHUGAN 
MAEGYONG cited data showing that in 1993, ROK firms received 
permission to invest in 57 projects in Vietnam worth a total of 
$201.939 million.  (Projects with planned investments of $1 million 
or more are listed below.)  The amount of investment realized in 
1993 totaled $43.563 million and involved 23 projects, according to 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG explained that until recently, considerations of 
ROK-U.S. ties and Washington's continued trade embargo against 
Vietnam limited ROK business efforts there.  In addition, a shortage 
of foreign exchange acted as an "immense stumbling block" to foreign 
investment in Vietnam.  The lifting of the trade embargo removed 
these barriers and CHUGAN MAEGYONG surmised that ROK investment in 
the SRV will now begin in earnest. 

   In addition, South Korea's Ministry of Trade, Industry, and 
Energy (MOTIE) expects developmental financial aid to Vietnam from 
advanced countries and international financial institutions to 
increase now that the embargo has ended.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG noted that 
the International Monetary Fund has granted Vietnam $1.86 billion in 
loans, while the International Bank for Reconstruction and 
Development has granted $1.7 billion, the Asia Development Bank $1.5 
billion, and Japan $500 million.  THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM reported 
that South Korea has given Vietnam $2 million in aid, and recently 
awarded $50 million in low interest loans from its Economic 
Development Cooperation Fund.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG quoted a MOTIE source 
who sees great potential for ROK firms to participate in large-scale 
infrastructure projects or resource development in Vietnam and for 
special procurement projects.  It also pointed out that, if the 
United States extends most-favored nation treatment to Vietnam, ROK 
light industry could invest locally and use Vietnam for "roundabout 
exports" to the United States.  To facilitate trade and investment, 
the ROK Government intends to sign a double taxation avoidance 
agreement with Vietnam in April.  The government will also begin 
executing the initial stage of its promised $50-million loan. 

   ROK firms have already been actively investing in Vietnam, 
according to both Vietnamese and ROK press reports.  THOI BAO KINH 
TE VIETNAM commented that more than 40 ROK firms have established 
offices in Vietnam.  The four leading ROK conglomerates--Hyundai, 
Samsung, Goldstar, and Daewoo--are "strongly active" in industries 
such as metallurgy, engineering, electronics, and construction.  The 
top six ROK investors are Daewoo, with six projects capitalized at 
$247.6 million; Seyoung International, with three projects 
capitalized at $42 million; Posco (Pohang Iron and Steel Co. Ltd.), 
with two projects capitalized at $13.3 million; Pangrim Ltd., with 
projects capitalized at $12.6 million; Hyosan Development, with a 
project capitalized at $12 million; and the Korea First Bank, whose 
Vietnam operations are capitalized at $10 million.  The paper noted 
that ROK investment projects include 35 in industry, four in heavy 
industry, three in tourism and hotel services, and the remainder in 
the services, marine products, agriculture, banking, communications, 
transportation, and postal services sectors. 

   ROK firms also have big plans for the future.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG 
reported that Hyundai plans to build a $100-million container 
factory and a $300-million power plant, and participate in 
infrastructure projects.  Samsung plans to set up four industrial 
complexes near Hanoi and Haiphong; is building plants to produce 
petrochemicals, textiles, and daily necessities; and will 
participate in infrastructure projects.  THOI BAO KINH TE VIETNAM 
further reported that Samsung's planned four industrial groups will 
be capitalized at $10 billion over the next 10 years.  They will 
include an electronics project in Hanoi, shipbuilding in Haiphong, 
and an industrial complex in Dong Nai in cooperation with Japan, 
Taiwan, and the United States.  The firm plans to build "Samsung 
Maintenance Centers" in Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City and future 
"Samsung Towns" in both north and south Vietnam.  The 19 February 
Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported that Goldstar will set up a 
joint-venture television plant and a countrywide service network, 
and that Daewoo plans to build a general home appliances factory in 
1995.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG added that Daewoo is considering building an 
agricultural chemical plant and a hotel.  Lucky-Goldstar is building 
an office building in Hanoi and a water supply and drainage system 
in Ho Chi Minh City.  Sunkyong plans to use Vietnam as a base from 
which to move into Southeast Asia and its leading petrochemical and 
textile subsidiaries are setting up plants there.  Meanwhile, 
Ssangyong and Korea Heavy Industries are cooperating on a $300- 
million cement factory.  Posco is building a steel plant, and also 
plans to build a highway between Hanoi and Haiphong. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG pointed out that it is not only ROK conglomerates 
who are interested in Vietnam.  Small and medium ROK businesses are 
also watching Vietnam with rising interest.  THOI BAO KINH TE 
VIETNAM noted that small ROK textile, toy, and shoe manufacturers 
are in the process of investing in Vietnam.  Foreign firms are also 
interested, CHUGAN MAEGYONG reported.  Indeed, South Korea's 
Economic Planning Board estimates that competition to invest in the 
Vietnamese market will become "severe" in the second half of this 
year.  CHUGAN MAEGYONG noted that some foreign firms continued their 
economic cooperation with Vietnam during the embargo, and that some 
Japanese and U.S. firms want to regain their former positions in the 
Vietnamese market.  The question of how ROK firms will be able to 
compete against these firms in Vietnam is becoming a pivotal issue, 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG said. 


                           ROK Investment in Vietnam 
                         (Unit:  $1 million) 

                        Planned                             Planned 
                        (Actual)                            (Actual) 
Investor                Investment    Investor 
Investment 

                         Textiles, Clothing 
Korea Mega Sports       13.24(12.62)  Hanil Co. 
1.39(0.60) 
Daewoo                  1.34(0)       Shin-cho Trading Co.  1.04(0) 
Pacific Co.             1.20(0)       Taehan Mobang         2.30(0) 
Dong-sung Trading  Co.  1.10(0)       New Korea Silk     4.21(0.07) 
Korea Moolsan                         Choongnam Spinning 
 (non-woven   fabrics)  1.98(1.98)     (cotton products)  1.40(1.40) 
Sambu  (shoes/leather)  1.0(0) 

                         Coarse Grain Metal 
Daewoo Electronics      2.13(2.13)    Daewoo Electronics    3.30(0) 
Orion                   50.22(11.0)   Kumhwa Industries  1.01(0.91) 
Goldstar Information    2.0(0)        Goldstar Cable        4.05(0) 

                            Petrochemicals 
Samyang                 3.50(1.05)    Upyong                1.29(0) 
Tonga Construction      3.98(0) 

                                Primary Metals 
Pusan Pipe              1.20(1.20)    POSCO                 8.42(0) 

                              Paper and Printing 
Tongyang CKY            1.0(0.65)     Hansol Paper Co.      2.38(0) 

                                Sporting Goods 
Korea Mega Sports       1.1(1.1)      Korea Sports          1.26(0) 

                                     Other 
POSCO (steel plate)     1.95(1.95)    Daewoo(food, hotels)60.25(2.0) 
Daesung Electric Wire   1.99(1.99)    Hyosan Development    3.0(0) 
Yijo (agricultural                    Tongsong Plant 
 products               7.0(0)        (machinery 
                                       outfitters)          1.05(0) 

(Note: Data listed in table was drawn from the 23 February CHUGAN 
MAEGYONG) 



   FEATURE:  ROK Electronics Firms Profit Through U.S. High-Tech - 
SUMMARY:  Samsung and Hyundai, two of South Korea's top electronics 
manufacturers, in recent months were able to solve technical 
problems blocking their development of advanced equipment by buying 
out U.S. firms, according to ROK press reports.  Samsung 
Electronics' acquisition of Harris Microwave Semiconductor gave the 
ROK firm next-generation chip technology, which it is now producing 
for the commercial market.  Hyundai's buyout of Maxtor provided a 
window to a host of high-tech products that Hyundai reportedly could 
not have developed on its own.  Both South Korean companies continue 
to benefit from subsidiaries established in the United States to 
obtain technology through "cooperative" links with American firms. 

   ROK press reports describe how two major South Korean electronics 
firms overcame their technological shortcomings and moved on to 
world leadership in their fields through U.S. technology.  In both 
cases, the "glorious deed" was accomplished through "strategic 
buyouts" of high-tech Silicon Valley manufacturers facing financial 
difficulties from the decline in U.S. defense spending and "intense" 
foreign competition. 

   MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported on 4 May 1993 Samsung Electronics' 
buyout of Harris Microwave Semiconductor, a San Jose company that 
built products for the U.S. defense industry.  According to MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN, Samsung acquired the company to "secure a world- 
standard technological capability" in the field of non-memory 
semiconductors, which the ROK conglomerate had lacked.  Samsung was 
able to acquire at one stroke technology that would allow the 
company to move into such lucrative fields as mobile and satellite 
communications, the newspaper noted. 

   The 24 February HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN reported that Samsung 
Electronics has begun mass producing gallium arsenide (GaAs) chips 
at its new Silicon Valley subsidiary Samsung Microwave 
Semiconductor.  According to the newspaper, Samsung succeeded in 
converting the chips from their former military applications to 
general use in mobile communications and high-speed computers--two 
areas for which Samsung's silicon-based chips are not suited.  The 
new semiconductors will also be used in 0.25-micron metal field 
effect transistors (FET) soon to be mass produced.  According to the 
paper, GaAs chips, though harder to engineer, perform better than 
silicon semiconductors, and will form a $6-billion market by 1995. 
Samsung expects to save $7 million annually in import costs ($2 
million more than it paid for Harris) and increase its 
competitiveness in communications equipment at a time when South 
Korea is opening its market to foreign sales. 

   Similarly, on 21 August 1993, MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported 
Hyundai Electronics' purchase of controlling stock and management 
rights in the U.S. firm Maxtor, the world's fifth largest 
manufacturer of computer hard disk drives (HDD) with 12 percent of 
the world market.  According to the newspaper, the sale enabled 
Hyundai to obtain "accumulated technology and various patents on HDD 
main components without paying royalties."  The move also gave 
Hyundai application-specific integrated circuit technology (ASIC's), 
in which South Korean firms are weak, other semiconductor products 
used with'HDD's, and technology for an optical-magnetic disk drive 
Hyundai wants to develop. 

   In a follow-up article on 9 March, CHUGAN MAEGYONG, a weekly 
magazine published by MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN, stated that Hyundai's 
buyout of Maxtor is being called "the most glorious deed since the 
company was established 10 years ago."  Previously, Samsung had been 
the only ROK manufacturer of HDD's; other South Korean companies had 
abandoned their projects because of technical difficulties.  Maxtor, 
which has R and D facilities at its headquarters in San Jose and in 
Colorado, production lines in Singapore and Hong Kong, and a 
distribution base in Ireland, had been in the red for two years 
before the takeover.  The magazine said that Hyundai Electronics is 
now developing ASIC's, disk media for HDD's, and a laser disk data 
retrieval mechanism, which would have been "difficult" for Hyundai 
to develop alone. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG reported that Hyundai personal computers have 
been losing their competitiveness as other countries' products 
improve technologically.  To regain its edge, Hyundai reportedly is 
strengthening its links with U.S. companies and its own U.S.-based 
subsidiaries.  Accord4ng to the magazine, Hyundai will market a 
central processing unit (CPU) for computer workstations in the first 
half of 1994 which it acquired through a U.S. subsidiary set up two 
years ago.  Another U.S. subsidiary called Magnetics Co. was 
established to "cooperate" with the U.S. firm Tandon in developing 
auxiliary memory.  Yet another Hyundai subsidiary (NFI) has been set 
up in the United States to work on laser disk drive technology. 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG pointed out, "The time when companies did all things 
by themselves is passing." 

   FEATURE:  Press Urges Continuous Government Support for HDTV - 
SUMMARY:  South Korean efforts to develop high-definition television 
(HDTV) through a government-sponsored consortium have not yielded 
the wellspring technology needed to market a commercial product by 
1996, according to a Seoul business newspaper.  The enormous expense 
of developing HDTV technology and the difficulty manufacturers are 
having obtaining it abroad lead the newspaper to call for government 
support beyond the scheduled July cutoff. 

     South Korea's efforts to develop HDTV have not lived up to 
expectations, and the industry may not achieve its goal of marketing 
a product by 1996 without more government support, the 2 March MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN claimed.  The newspaper reported that the ROK's four 
major electronics companies--Samsung, Goldstar, Hyundai, and Daewoo- 
-have been working jointly with the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and 
Energy's (MOTIE) Industrial Technology Research Institute and other 
government agencies, such as the Electronics and Telecommunications 
Research Institute, since 1990 to develop HDTV technology.  Total 
research outlays, public and private, reportedly have exceeded 100 
billion won ($125 million).  In July this year, government support 
for the program is scheduled to end, and the four companies are to 
engage in independent development, according to the present 
arrangement. 

   MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported that Samsung Electronics will 
increase its HDTV research staff by 100 and divide the project into 
three areas:  HDTV equipment, application-specific integrated 
circuits (ASIC's), and cathode ray tubes.  Goldstar will pursue 
joint cooperation with a U.S. firm through its North American 
research institute in Chicago.  Daewoo and Hyundai will also move 
"full scale" into technological development.  According to the 9 
March CHUGAN MAEGYONG, the four companies under the direction of the 
ROK Government had been developing both digital and analog systems, 
but switched over to the U.S. digital standard this year.  All four 
firms plan to mass produce their own HDTV sets by 1996, the magazine 
said. 

   After nearly four years of development, however, South Korean 
"HDTV technology is only at the beginning stage by comparison with 
the advanced countries," MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN complained.  ROK firms 
reportedly "have not been able to get beyond the basic level in 
developing technologies for digital signal processing and core 
integrated circuits."  The paper quoted "an industry expert" to the 
effect that HDTV equipment shown at the Taejon Expo was a prototype 
and cannot be readily commercialized.  The same source claimed that 
South Korea lacks design technology for the necessary ASIC's, and 
that "it would not be easy to develop it independently."  The 
newspaper adds that foreign firms are "stingy" about transferring 
HDTV technology, and the money needed for development is "enormous." 

   With the July cutoff approaching, MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN cautioned, 
"it would be extremely dangerous for each company to develop HDTV 
without government support."  In the newspaper's estimate, continued 
involvement by the government is needed to insure cooperation 
between the industrial and research sectors, and to promote 
indigenization of HDTV core technology, which the country allegedly 
lacks. 

   FEATURE:  Recent Semiconductor Developments Reported - SUMMARY: 
ROK semiconductor manufacturers made headlines in recent weeks with 
several technological advances that will enhance the industry's 
competitiveness while cutting down on imports and royalty fees. 
This move toward greater self-sufficiency will be accelerated by new 
government subsidies to ROK firms working to indigenize 
manufacturing equipment.  According to press accounts, South Korea's 
emergence as a world leader in semiconductors is further evidenced 
by Samsung's ability to form a cooperative agreement with the 
Japanese firm NEC on next-generation 256M DRAM's 

   Articles in South Korean business newspapers highlight several 
recent advances in that country's semiconductor industry. 

   Kukje Corporation has developed a heterojuncture bipolar 
transistor (HBT) for use in mobile and wireless telecommunications, 
according to the 15 March MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN.  The device, a 
gallium arsenide (GaAs) compound semiconductor used for signal 
amplification, reportedly is more efficient than a silicon bipolar 
chip or GaAs field effect transistor.  When used with existing 
equipment, the HBT allows the power module to be reduced to a 
quarter of its original size and the battery by two-thirds, and 
triples the calling time, Kukje claims.  It will reduce South 
Korea's import costs by more than $10 million annually, while making 
it possible to build smaller and lighter communications equipment. 
Kukje invested 50 billion won ($62.5 million) in R and D and 
equipment.  Although the U.S. firm TRW has developed HBT's for 
military use, Kukje was the first ROK company to commercialize the 
product, the paper stated. 

   Samsung Electronics successfully "indigenized" an application- 
specific integrated circuit (ASIC) used to correct errors in 
wireless communications equipment, the 4 March MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 
reported.  The chip, which contains 89,000 gates (the basic units 
making up a logic circuit), reportedly took Samsung 17 months and 1 
billion won ($1.25 million) to develop.  The paper said the company 
will save 20 billion won ($25 million) annually in imports and be 
able to expedite development of semiconductors used in satellite 
communications. 

   Six South Korean companies working jointly under the direction of 
the Korean Printed Circuit Board Research Association have produced 
the ROK's first 42-layer printed circuit board, according to the 8 
March MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN.  The product, which occupied 60 
researchers for a year at a cost of 1 billion won ($1.25 million), 
will have applications in "electronic equipment such as 
supercomputers used in the defense and aerospace industries," as 
well as time-division exchange (TDX) switching equipment and 
workstations.  South Korea had totally depended on U.S. and Japanese 
imports for the product, whose development is expected to shave $30 
million from import costs over the next six months.  Technical spin- 
off is reported to be "considerable."  The six companies involved in 
the project are: Dae-duck Electronics, Saehan Electronics, Korea 
Circuit Co., Hanil Circuit Corp., Woojin Electronics, and Goldstar 
Telecommunication Co. 

   Meanwhile, the 3 March MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported that work 
has begun on Anam Semiconductor Technology's second Chonan plant. 
When completed in August, the plant will produce 3,000 photo masks 
and 6 million lead frames per month, enabling South Korea to reduce 
Japanese imports of these items and manufacture some quantity for 
export.  Production reportedly is supported by technology agreements 
with U.S. and Japanese firms. 

   According to HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN on 24 February, South Korea's 
government will spend 20 billion won ($25 million) between now and 
1997 to indigenize semiconductor manufacturing equipment.  The plan, 
announced by the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE) on 
23 February, calls for industry to supplement the funds with 30 
billion won ($37.5 million) aimed at raising the level of indigenous 
semiconductor equipment from the present 12 percent to 50 percent. 
MOTIE will lead technical development, encourage information sharing 
between companies, and take active measures through direct aid or 
tax relief to support companies facing dumping charges for exporting 
indigenous products.  The paper noted that ROK-built semiconductor 
equipment had a value of $145 million in 1993, from a total domestic 
demand of $1.2 billion. 

   Finally, the 2 March issue of MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN reported that 
Samsung Electronics and Japan's NEC will exchange technology for the 
development of 256M DRAM's.  Cooperation reportedly will focus on a 
new type of cell architecture which could hasten commercialization 
of the product considerably.  Talks are under way to expand the 
scope of the agreement to include production.  Some "industry 
experts" believe the two companies may also cooperate on non-memory 
semiconductor products.  MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN noted that Samsung is 
particularly interested in working with NEC on 0.25 micron 
processing technology for logic circuits. 

   New Techno-Complex To Merge Industrial, Academic Research - 
Construction began 23 February on Korea University's Techno-Complex, 
a unique facility that will bring researchers from ROK companies and 
other institutions into contact with leading university scientists 
and engineers.  Located on a 5-acre site in Seoul's Tongdaemun area, 
the complex will host some 30 companies and laboratories by the end 
of 1996, whose personnel will conduct joint research with the 
university's faculty.  Most fields of natural science will be 
represented, including information science, communications, 
automation, semiconductors, computers, environment, bioengineering, 
new materials, precision machinery, medicine, and construction. 

   Companies moving into the complex will pay a fee based on the 
space they occupy and receive free use of the facilities for 20 
years.  Samsung Electronics, Pohang Steel, Lucky-Goldstar, Dacom, 
Samyang, and seven others have already signed agreements.  The Korea 
Research Institute of Standards and Science (a government R and D 
institute under the Ministry of Science and Technology) will be 
involved through the Seoul office of its Basic Science Support 
Center.  Scientific equipment worth $35 million will be brought into 
the complex over the next three years. 

   South Korean companies are facing "enormous challenges" brought 
about by the opening of domestic markets, technological 
protectionism, and increased concern with intellectual property 
rights, necessitating close alliances between ROK businesses, 
universities, and research labs.  Although industry accounts for 70 
percent of the country's total R and D expenditures, it employs only 
4.5 percent of its PhD's.  Conversely, universities have 80 percent 
of the doctorates and less than 10 percent of the research funds. 
Korea University's new facility will help eliminate this imbalance 
by bringing together scientists and technicians from industry, 
academia, and research institutes.  Other South Korean universities 
planning similar facilities are Seoul National, Yonsei, and Hanyang. 
(Seoul CHUGAN MAEGYONG 9 March 94 pp 78-79) 

   Multipurpose Research Reactor Nearing Completion - The ROK's 
Korea Atomic Energy Research Institute (KAERI) has designated 1994 
as "Year One to Leap Forward and Internationalize Development of the 
Country's Nuclear Power Technology."  This year, the institute will 
expand its efforts to link advanced technologies such as lasers, 
robotics, superconductors, and new materials with nuclear power.  It 
will also "support the development of nuclear technology needed to 
secure the country's public safety and to respond effectively to 
changing conditions and nuclear incidents in countries on the 
periphery, such as Russia's recent dumping of radioactive waste 
materials in the East Sea, China's nuclear testing, and North-South 
nuclear inspections. 

   The institute will continue to develop technology used with 
research reactors.  At the end of the year, South Korea's 30-mw 
research reactor will be completed and go into operation. 
Associated facilites, such as hydraulic transfer equipment for 
neutron-irradiated test samples and equipment to produce radioactive 
isotopes, will also be ready.  When the reactor goes on line, 
research can proceed in such areas as advanced materials and nuclear 
fuel development.  Production of medical and industrial-use 
radioactive isotopes will increase significantly. 

   "In order to obtain advanced nuclear technology at an early date, 
South Korea will actively pursue joint international research with 
advanced countries and strengthen technical exchanges with leading 
nations to be able to respond spontaneously to rapid changes in the 
political situation."  (Seoul WONJARYOK Jan 94 pp 19-21) 

   Samsung 'Gets Serious' About Aircraft Engine Development - 
Samsung Aerospace Industries, Ltd. is "getting serious" about 
developing an aircraft engine.  It has set up medium- and long-term 
development plans, which include working toward producing a 
prototype aircraft engine by the year 2000.  By 1996, it expects to 
complete development of a 1.2-mw small-size industrial use gas 
turbine engine.  It also plans to accumulate gas turbine technology 
and link it to development of an aircraft engine.  Currently Samsung 
has an "indigenization rate" of 40 percent for its small aircraft 
engines.  It hopes to raise this rate to 80 percent by 1996. 

   The company is participating in developing the PW40O0 engine 
(used in large passenger aircraft) with the U.S. firm Pratt and 
Whitney, and is planning international joint enterprises geared 
toward new engine development.  In addition, Samsung has hired 30 
Russian gas turbine technicians to work in South Korea on designing 
and developing engines.  The company will also send a delegation to 
Russia in June to bring in Russian technology for manufacturing 
aircraft engines.  As a preliminary to developing aircraft engines, 
it is moving into producing engine components.  It recently 
developed parts for the air intake apparatus on the F1O0 engine and 
will supply 5.1-billion won ($6.375 million) worth of the parts to 
Pratt and Whitney until 1995.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 22 Feb 94 
p 22) 

   Patent Office To Set Up Center To Promote Patent 
Commercialization - The Office of Patent Administration (OPA) will 
set up a so-called "patent real estate office" in the second half of 
this year to help commercialize new technologies.  According to OPA, 
about 30 percent of all patent or utility model applications are 
filed by small businesses or individual inventors, and most new 
technologies are never commercialized.  The new patent mediation 
center will promote the commercialization of superior patented 
technologies that have business applications.  The center will set 
up a committee to examine superior patented technologies and 
evaluate newly invented technologies.  It can also establish 
rational royalty fees that businesses pay when using a new 
technology.  This will prevent patent disputes before they arise. 
OPA also plans to set up a fund to promote inventions so that small 
businesses can commercialize their technologies earlier.  (Seoul 
MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 23 Feb 94 p 2) 

   Tax Audits Based on Foreign Car Ownership To Stop - On 7 
February, the National Tax Administration instructed South Korea's 
137 tax offices not to conduct tax audits based solely on a person's 
ownership of a foreign-made automobile.  The Ministry of Trade, 
Industry, and Energy noted that the United States and the European 
Union view such audits as a disadvantage to those who purchase 
foreign-made cars.  (Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 18 Feb 94 p 1) 
(Note:  This article appeared at the bottom of page 1, under a small 
headline.) 

   Samsung Wins Order for Gas Platform Off Malaysia - Samsung Heavy 
Industries has won an order for an offshore gas platform from 
Petronas, the state-owned Malaysian oil company.  Samsung competed 
against other foreign firms for the $55-million project, which will 
involve setting up an offshore gas production facility about 250 km 
northeast of the state of Sarawak.  The platform will weigh 10,000 
tons and will be 84 meters long, 32 meters wide, and 26.7 meters 
high.  The project is scheduled to be completed in November 1995. 
(Seoul HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN 24 Feb 94 p 10) 

   LCD Makers Form 'United Front' Against Foreign Patent Offensive - 
On 17 February, six ROK liquid crystal display (LCD) producers 
formed an LCD patent investigation committee that will serve as a 
"united front" against foreign companies' "patent offensives."  The 
committee will enable the ROK firms to share information on domestic 
and foreign LCD patents and jointly analyze foreign companies' 
patented technology.  In order to prevent patent disputes, the South 
Korean firms will document their own development of patented LCD 
technologies and then share these technologies with one another. 
The foreign "patent offensive" first appeared last year, when the 
Swiss company ABB asked a ROK firm to pay patent fees equal to 2.7 
percent of its total sales.  Last year, many of the patents 
registered by foreign companies were related to LCD production, and 
a surge in patent offensives is expected in 1995, when ROK firms 
begin mass production of thin-film transistor (TFT) LCD units. 
South Korean firms believe that, if foreign companies were to demand 
all of their patent fees, they would have to pay out as much as 30 
percent of their sales receipts to cover the cost.  (Seoul HANGUK 
KYONGJE SINMUN 18 Feb 94 p 10) 

   Textile Firms' Investment in China Increasing - ROK textile 
companies are rapidly increasing their investment in the Chinese 
market.  As of the end of 1993, 260 South Korean textile firms had 
moved into into the Chinese market.  This equals 43.1 percent of the 
603 ROK textile companies that have invested in overseas markets. 
The approved investment amount for these 260 firms totaled $195 
million.  The firms include 156 garment makers, 32 fabric makers, 
and five fabric dyeing companies.  With regard to investment 
location, 69 companies have gone into Shandong Province, 31 into 
Tianjin, 23 into Jilin Province, 18 into Liaoning Province, and 12 
into Beijing.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 28 Mar 94 p 10) 

   Kia Sets Up Auto Assembly Joint Venture in Indonesia - Kia is 
establishing an auto assembly joint venture in Indonesia.   Kia will 
own 30 percent of the company, with Indauda Putra National Motors 
owning the rest.  The venture will be capitalized at $100 million, 
in partnership with Indonesian Humpuss and Udatinda business groups. 
Initial annual production is expected to total 50,000 subcompact 
cars.  Kia will also build a new plant near Jakarta by 1997.  That 
plant will be able to assemble 100,000 cars by the year 2000. 
(Seoul CHOSON ILBO 25 Mar 94 p 11) 

   Samsung-Mitsubishi Consortium Wins Shipbuilding Order - A 
consortium formed by Samsung Heavy Industries and Japan's Mitsubishi 
Heavy Industries has received an order from Hong Kong's Orient 
Overseas Container Line for the world's biggest container ships. 
This is the first time that ROK and Japanese companies have formed a 
consortium in the shipbuilding industry, which is famous for its 
"fierce" international competition.  Samsung will build two of the 
six ships, which can carry up to 4,950 containers of 20-foot 
equivalent units.  Mitsubishi will build the remaining vessels.  The 
ships are to be delivered to Hong Kong between late 1995 and late 
March 1996.  (Seoul YONHAP 0633 GMT 17 Mar 94) 

   MOTIE Reports on Construction Contracts in China - Sino-ROK 
cooperation in the construction field is picking up, according to 
the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE).  As of the end 
of January, Hyundai Heavy Industries had received orders for a 
$32.38-million WEI 11-4 offshore installation, a $17.57-million 
Yacheng 13-1 gas platform, and a $14.5-million Yacheng process 
platform.  Samsung Construction had received a $31.21-million order 
to build a ring road in Shanghai, and Yigong had received a design 
and construction order worth $3.99 million.  Other pending 
construction projects by ROK firms include the $65-million Tangshan 
Port docks project by Halla; the $400-million Xiaolangdi multi- 
purpose dam project by Hyundai; the $600-million Hebei provincial 
expressway project by Lucky Development, Samhwan Enterprise, Hanbo 
Steel, and Hyundai Construction Co; the $35-million Henan provincial 
expressway project by Samhwan, Hanbo Steel, and Lucky Development; 
and the Guangzhou subway project by Dongbu Construction.  In 
addition, Daewoo plans to bid on the $4.8-billion Changjiang dam 
project.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 28 Mar 94 p 4) 

   Dong-Ah To Build Two Power Plants in China - Dong-Ah Construction 
Industrial Co. has won orders worth $315 million to construct two 
thermal-power co-generation plants in China.  Each plant will be 
able to generate 150,000 kw annually.  The first phase of 
construction of the Xinxiang plant, to be located in Henan Province, 
will run from June 1995 to June 1996, and the second phase from 
January 1996 to December 1997.  The first phase for the Huamei 
plant, to be located in Beijing, will run from June 1995 to December 
1997, and the second phase from January 1996 to December 1998. 
(Seoul THE KOREA TIMES 31 Mar 94 p 8) 

   Goldstar To Invest $200 Million in VCR, CRT Plants in China - 
Goldstar will invest $200 million to build VCR and color CRT 
(cathode-ray tube) plants in Shanghai and Changsha, Hunan Province. 
The firm has a joint-venture agreement with the Xiguang Electronics 
Group of Hunan to build the Changsha plant by January 1996.  The 
plant will produce 1 million 21- and 25-inch CRT's annually for 
domestic consumption.  On 25 March, Goldstar will sign an agreement 
with Shanghai Recording Plant to produce VCR's starting in March 
1995.  The VCR plant will produce 300,000 Goldstar-brand units 
annually and mainly supply the Chinese market, although some of its 
production will be exported.  (Seoul CHOSON ILBO 25 Mar 94 p 10) 

   Yukong Working Towards Oil Refinery Agreement With China - Yukong 
Ltd., a major affiliate of the Sunkyong group, has agreed in 
principle to build an oil refinery facility in Shenzhen through a 
joint venture with Chinese companies.  Construction costs are 
expected to reach $1.5 billion, with completion set for early 1998. 
The plant's processing capacity is expected to be 110,000 barrels of 
oil daily.  If realized, the project will be the largest ever 
between South Korea and China.  By the end of this year, Yukong and 
its Chinese counterparts will establish a joint venture company, 
capitalized at $375 million.  Yukong will contribute some 40 percent 
of the needed capital, with SINOPEC (China's state oil company) and 
the Shenzhen government supplying the remaining 35 and 25 percent. 
The crude oil used in plant operations will be imported from the 
Middle East, and the plant's petroleum products will be sold in Hong 
Kong, Shenzhen, and in foreign countries.  (Seoul THE KOREA TIMES 31 
Mar 94 p 8) 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - BURMA:  FEATURE:  Barter Trade Activities in 
Burma Reported - SUMMARY:  According to an Indonesian economic 
weekly, although doing business with Burma through barter or counter 
trade is "challenging and risky," it may still be the best way to 
bypass "cumbersome foreign exchange regulations."  The weekly 
reported that in the last two years, barter trade  has played a 
significant part in Burma's economic revival. 

   The 7 March Jakarta WARTA EKONOMI described Burma as a country 
that is  short of foreign exchange, receives no foreign aid from 
western countries because of its poor record on human rights, has $1 
billion in arrears, and offers an official exchange rate that is 20 
times the black market rate.  However, the magazine said, in spite 
of these problems, Burma's economy has grown 5 to 6  percent 
annually for the past two years, largely thanks to barter or counter 
trade. 

   According to WARTA EKONOMI, in recent years, the Burmese 
Government has "cautiously liberalized" its economy, encouraged 
border trade with China, and courted investors from Thailand and 
Singapore.  The magazine noted that many Burmese and foreign import- 
export companies have "reluctantly" committed themselves to barter 
transactions, "challenging and risky" though they may be, because 
this was a way to avoid dealing with many "cumbersome foreign 
exchange regulations."  The magazine reported that a multimillion- 
dollar project involving the Burmese Ministry of Foreign Affairs and 
Turnkey Contracts and Consultancy of Singapore was completed 
recently:  under an "exchange-of-products" agreement, a modern, 
international business center was built in Rangoon, in which 
companies such as Sumimoto and Texoca have reserved space, and was 
paid for in logs. 

   WARTA EKONOMI stated that private companies must pay for their 
imports with earnings from exports.  These companies are also 
required to spend 25 percent of their export earnings on imports 
that the government deems essential (such as palm oil) or else, 
convert 20 percent of their hard currency into kyat at the official 
exchange rate, the magazine said. 

   WARTA EKONOMI revealed that most of Burma's 5,000 small import- 
export companies, which have not been in business long enough to 
build up foreign exchange reserves to pay for their imports, 
participate in barter trade.  Consequently, foreign companies owned 
by the importers' Sino-Burmese relatives living in Hong Kong, 
Singapore, or Bangkok, have become involved in barter trade.  These 
foreign companies send electronic goods, cement, machinery, or 
pharmaceuticals to Burma on consignment or credit.  The importers 
then sell the goods for kyat, use the money to buy local products 
(rice, beans, teak, or fish) for export through the foreign 
companies, and, in that way, obtain dollars to pay for the original 
imports.  However, the magazine added, "fierce competition" to buy 
the limited quantities of Burmese commodities available for export 
has pushed up prices, cutting into the profits of both parties. 

   WARTA EKONOMI also highlighted other problems in connection with 
barter trade.  It pointed out that different imports to Burma 
command different exchange rates depending on the scarcity of or 
demand for the product.  For instance, a dollar's worth of palm oil 
sells for about 90 kyat, whereas a dollar's worth of medicines can 
earn up to 180 kyat.  The magazine stressed that traders must know 
what products are smuggled in from China and what products are 
bought and paid for in kyat by state enterprises at the official 
exchange rate, as these products will undercut the price of goods 
brought in legally by private companies for barter deals. 

   Meanwhile, Burmese businessmen are complaining that barter trade 
allows foreigners to make money at both ends, WARTA EKONOMI 
reported.  They claim, for instance, that a Taiwanese company can 
sell trucks at a profit to Burma, receive payment in logs, and in 
turn, sell the logs in Taiwan at a profit.  In conclusion, the 
magazine cited the example of a Scottish trader who has done 
business with Burma since 1988 and can testify that foreigners risk 
losing money as well.  This trader, according to WARTA EKONOMI, has 
not been paid for a milk powder and palm oil shipment worth 
$209,000.  His only recourse has been to send a letter of complaint 
to the Burmese Trade Ministry, which has brought no results to date. 
   INDONESIA:  Indocement Signs Agreement With Korean, Japanese 
Firms - P.T. Indocement, Indonesia's largest cement manufacturer, 
recently signed an agreement with Korea Development Company, Ltd. 
(Kodeco) and Marubeni Company of Japan to build a $420-million 
cement plant in South Kalimantan Province.  The plant, scheduled to 
begin operations in 1997, will have an annual production capacity of 
2.3 million tons.  Indocement owns 51 percent of the joint venture, 
Kodeco 46 percent, and Marubeni 3 percent.  (Jakarta BISNIS 
INDONESIA 3 Mar 94 p 7) 

   Official Predicts Growth in Stock Trading - Barcelius Ruru, 
chairman of the Capital Market Supervisory Board, recently stated 
that Indonesia's stock market could rise 10-fold to $100 billion in 
a few years.  He said there is "substantial room for growth" because 
the trading volume in Indonesia is still below 8 percent of GDP. 
Ruru noted that to encourage growth, the government has removed 
regulatory and fiscal barriers, and enforced financial disclosure 
and fair market practices.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 21 Feb 94 p 5) 

   Banking Sector Has $12.7 Billion in Bad Debts - The banking 
sector has accumulated $12.7 billion in bad debts and non-performing 
loans, of which $9.17 billion is accounted for by the seven state 
banks--Export-Import Bank of Indonesia, BNI, the National Trade 
Bank, Bank Bumi Daya, the People's Bank of Indonesia, the State 
Savings Bank, and the National Development Bank of Indonesia 
(Bapindo).  An investigation of a recent "banking scam" revealed 
that in one transaction, Bapindo suffered a $630-million loss 
(including interest) when a $430-million letter of credit--extended 
two years ago to businessman Eddy Tansil of the Golden Key group- 
-was not paid up.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 2 Mar 94 p 5) 

   1993 Coal Production Reaches 27 Million Metric Tons - Ambyo 
Mangunwijaya, president director of the coal company Bukit Asam Co. 
Ltd, recently said that Indonesia ranks fourth in the world in coal 
exports after Australia, South Africa, and Colombia.  He also stated 
that coal output reached 27 million metric tons in 1993, an increase 
of more than 300 percent compared with 1989's production.  (Jakarta 
ANTARA 1036 GMT 31 Mar 94) 

   LAOS:  Norwegian, Thai Firms Contract To Design Hydropower Dam - 
Electricite du Laos and the Nor-Consul Company of Norway recently 
signed an agreement on the engineering design for the Nam Theun-Hin 
Boun or Nam Theun 1-2 hydropower dam.  The cost of the design comes 
to about $4.6 million and will be paid for by a grant from the 
Norwegian Government to the Lao Government.  The 210-mw hydropower 
station is scheduled to be completed at the end of 1997.  It will 
generate 1,530 million kwh a year, all of which will be sold to 
Thailand.  Construction costs will reach $280 million, of which $110 
million will come from the Lao Government (55 percent), the Nordic 
Group (25 percent), and the MDX Group of Thailand (20 percent). 
(Vientiane KPL 0911 GMT 30 Mar 94) 

   MALAYSIA:  Incentives for Eastern Corridor Announced - 
International Trade and Industry Minister Rafidah Aziz recently 
announced the following new incentives for investors interested in 
developing the Eastern Corridor, Sabah, and Sarawak:  1) Full import 
duty exemption on raw material, components, and parts not available 
locally; 2) One-hundred percent tax allowance on infrastructure 
expenditures, such as construction of bridges and roads; and 3) 
Second round of "pioneer status" for existing and new companies. 
(Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARlAN 23 Feb 94 p 7) 

   Telecommunications Investment Opportunity Offered - Energy, 
Telecommunications, and Post Minister Samy Vellu recently stated 
that Malaysia is offering interested parties a "big opportunity" to 
invest in telecommunications.  The country plans to develop its 
telecommunications industry in the next five years to the tune of 
$6.48 billion.  Malaysia Telekom, the national telecommunications 
carrier, intends to spend $268 million on its local network and $64 
million on its international network.  The minister said that 
Malaysia wants to become an exporter of telecommunications equipment 
and the "center of telecommunications activities" in the region. 
(Kuala Lumpur UTUSAN MALAYSIA 1 Mar 94 p 4) 

   Joint Venture Plant To Be Built in Algeria - Josina, a local palm 
oil trader, and Arome d'Algerie recently signed a $30-million joint- 
venture agreement to establish a plant in Algeria to process and 
manufacture vegetable oil and fats.  Both sides said that the 
project, which will be completed in June 1995, marks the beginning 
of future business collaborations and stronger bilateral relations. 
Algeria has imported 200,000 tons of processed palm oil worth $20 
million from Malaysia in the past.  This year, it expects to import 
about $40 million worth of palm oil.  (Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARIAN 2 
Mar 94 p 7) 

   Joint-Venture Petrochemical Plant in Johor Inaugurated - On 24 
March, International Trade and Industry Minister Sri Rafidah Aziz 
inaugurated the $570-million Titan Petrochemical Complex in Pasir 
Gudang, Johor.  The plant is a joint venture between Taiwan's Titan 
Group, Malaysia's PNB (National Investment Board) Equity Resource 
Corporation, Australia's BTR Nylex Ltd., the United States' Himont, 
Inc., and China's Sinochem.  It has an annual production capacity of 
230,000 metric tons of ethylene and 115,000 metric tons of 
propylene, to be used in plastic manufacturing.  (Kuala Lumpur NEW 
STRAITS TIMES 25 Mar 94 p 16) 

   Company Forms Joint Venture With Vietnamese Firm - Asia Pacific 
Land Bhd (AP Land Limited) has teamed up with Vietnam's Tamexco Ltd. 
to form an investment joint venture by acquiring a Vietnamese 
incorporated bank, Tancom Bank.  The new venture, in which AP Land 
holds a 70-percent stake, will invest $19 million in the bank and in 
property development.  The memorandum of understanding for the 
venture was signed by AP Land Managing Director Jeffrey T.L. Ng and 
Tamexco Director Pham Huy Phuoc, who is also chairman of the 
administration board of Tancom Bank.  (Kuala Lumpur NEW STRAITS 
TIMES 25 Mar 94 p 17) 

   PHILIPPINES:  Government Approves Power Plant Project - The Board 
of Investments has approved the $115-million power project of the 
East Asia Power Corporation.  The power plant is one of five 
projects to be built by the National Power Corporation to ensure 
sufficient supplies of electricity for this summer.  (Quezon City 
PTV-4 Television 0500 GMT 25 Mar 94) 

   THAILAND:  Bank Credit Expansion, Inflation Rate Reported - Bank 
of Thailand spokesman Phisit Li-atham recently reported that the 
annual bank credit expansion rate at the end of February was 21.6 
percent, still within the bank's target ceiling of about 24 percent. 
However, deposits rose by only 17 percent to $95.2 billion.  With 
outstanding credit at $107.2 billion, this meant a ratio of credit 
to deposits of 112 percent, a record in Thai financial history 
because the ratio had never been higher than 110 percent.  Phisit 
also said that the inflation rate in February rose to 3.6 percent, 
compared to 3.3 percent for the same month last year.  Foreign 
reserves were recorded at $26.25 billion at the end of February. 
(Bangkok MATICHON 18 Mar 94 p 9) 

   Military Bank Grants Loans to Vietnamese Bank - Wirasak Apharak, 
deputy general manager of the Thai Military Bank, disclosed on 16 
March that his bank has granted a $5-million loan to Vietnam's 
Agricultural Bank.  The loan carries a 2.75-percent interest rate 
under a 6-month repayment period, with the State Bank of Vietnam 
acting as the guarantor.  In January, the Thai Military Bank loaned 
the same amount to the Vietcom Bank of Vietnam.  Last year, the 
branch office in Ho Chi Minh City granted $10 million in loans to 
Vietnamese government agencies and $3.5 million to Thai animal feed 
producers in that country.   The Thai Military Bank is planning to 
open a second branch office in Hanoi.  (Bangkok PHUCHATKAN 18 Mar 94 
p 4) 

   State Petroleum Firm Forms Joint Ventures in PRC, Vietnam - The 
Council of Economic Ministers has given permission to the state-run 
Petroleum Authority of Thailand (PTT) to form a partnership with the 
Charoen Phokphan Group, and petrochemicals firms in China and 
Vietnam to run oil businesses in the three countries involved.  The 
approval is in line with policy guidelines allowing state 
enterprises to move into international trade.  The joint ventures 
involve a total investment of $249.6 million, $25.44 million of 
which is PTT's share.  The ventures will be located in several 
cities in China and Vietnam, with PTT and Charoen Phokphan as the 
main shareholders.  In China, the PTT will finance service stations 
in Guangdong, Maoming, Shanghai, Tianjin, and Dalian.  In Vietnam, 
PTT will open service stations and an oil terminal wharf, and it 
will run a liquefied petroleum gas business in Ho Chi Minh City. 
(Bangkok BANGKOK POST 22 Mar 94 p 24) 

   Power Plant To Be Established With PRC's Wuxi Province - Saha 
Union Corp. has signed a joint-venture agreement with Wuxi High-Tech 
Industrial Development to invest $30 million in a 30-mw power plant 
in Wuxi Province, China.  The project is one of three power schemes 
recently endorsed by Chinese and Thai partners.  Union Energy Co, 
wholly owned by Saha Union, owns 40 percent of the project, while 
Wuxi High-Tech Industrial Development and a Hong Kong company hold 
50 and 10 percent, respectively.  According to their earlier 
memorandum of understanding, Saha Union will carry out six ventures, 
all of which involve power plants with capacities ranging from 10 to 
30 mw, requiring a combined investment of $100 million.  (Bangkok 
THE NATION 22 Mar 94 p B4) 

   Company Invests in Hotel Construction in Burma - The Kuok Group 
has committed to investing $150 million in two hotel construction 
projects in Burma.  The group recently signed an agreement with 
Burma's Directorate of Hotels and Tourism in Rangoon.  One hotel 
will be a 400-room first-class business hotel and is targeted to 
open in early 1997.  The second will be a deluxe property with 450 
rooms.  (Bangkok THE NATION 31 Mar 94 p B2) 

   Bank Arranges Loan for SRV Central Bank - The State Bank of 
Vietnam has mandated the Export-Import (Exim) Bank of Thailand and 
Krung Thai Bank to arrange for $100 million in internationally 
syndicated loans.  Exim Bank President Pridiyathon Thewakun and 
Krung Thai Bank Executive President Suwit Udomsap met recently in 
Hanoi with Deputy State Bank Governor Le Van Chau, and the two sides 
hope to conclude an agreement soon, after further talks on interest 
rates.  The "untied" loan, destined for general economic development 
purposes, was initiated by the Bank of Thailand at the request of 
the State Bank of Vietnam.  Exim Bank will seek participation by 
foreign banks operating through the Bangkok International Banking 
Facilities in Thailand, while Krung Thai Bank will coordinate with 
interested Thai banks, including Bangkok Bank and the Thai Military 
Bank, which have full commercial branches in Ho Chi Minh City. 
Krung Thai has representative offices in Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City, 
and is applying for a branch license.  Suwit said the term of the 
syndicated loan is five years, with interest rates floating with the 
world market rate, and no guarantees. 

   Vietnam's experience in the private market so far has been with 
short-term credit of less than one year.  "We have encouraged 
Vietnam to step into the international lending market, establishing 
its credibility in the place that will become another major source 
of capital as Vietnam's development speeds up," Pridiyathon said, 
adding that Vietnam has controlled inflation well, stabilized its 
currency, and maintained a sound economy, all of which qualify it as 
a "credible borrower" in the private market.  (Bangkok BANGKOK P0ST 
28 Mar 94 p 21) 

   VIETNAM:  FEATURE:  Increased ROK Trade, Investment in Vietnam 
Reported (See SOUTH KOREA) 

   Singapore's Keppel Group To Invest in Shipbuilding, Construction 
- Keppel Group, a large Singapore-based conglomerate with extensive 
shipbuilding interests, will undertake large investment projects in 
Vietnam in the shipbuilding, construction, and communications 
sectors.  In shipbuilding, Keppel has reached agreement with the 
state-owned Ba Son Shipbuilding Co. to establish a joint-venture 
company, Keppel-Ba Son Shipyard and Engineering, in Ho Chi Minh 
City.  Keppel will contribute 60 percent of the $44 million in 
capital and will lease facilities from Ba Son to build and repair 
foreign ships. 

   According to Keppel Chairman Sim Kee Boon, the two companies have 
also signed an agreement to build a new shipyard in Vung Tau, near 
Vietnam's offshore oil drilling areas, "which will make Vietnam an 
important foreign shipbuilding base second only to the Philippines" 
in the region. 

   In addition, Straits Steamship Land, a Keppel subsidiary, will 
develop a real estate complex in Hanoi involving residential 
housing, office buildings, and a "communications center."  The 
project will be developed "jointly with Vietnamese capital." 

   In the telecommunications sector, Steamers Maritime Holdings, 
another Keppel subsidiary, in a project undertaken together with Ho 
Chi Minh City's Posts and Communications Office, has just put into 
operation a $3.7-million "two-way CT2 Citynet telecommunications 
system."  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 10 Mar 94 p 12) 

   Singapore To Assist in Building New Industrial Zone - The 
Singaporean Government will assist in the construction of an 
industrial zone 8 to 10 square km in size, either in Hanoi or Ho Chi 
Minh City.  Do Muoi, General Secretary of the Communist Party of 
Vietnam, made the request for assistance to Singapore Prime Minister 
Goh Chok Tong during his visit to Vietnam, and Goh responded 
positively.  Do Muoi also requested Singapore's cooperation in 
providing industrial technology assistance, and construction and 
management assistance. 

   The Singapore Government is in the process of setting up a 
meeting with the Vietnamese side to decide whether there is a 
suitable site near an airport, what is an acceptable price for the 
land required for the zone, and "what kind of incentives can be 
expected from the Vietnamese authorities."  (Tokyo NIKi?I SANGYO 
                                                      ? 
SHIMBUN 11 Mar 94 p 3) 

   Daewoo Investments in Vietnam Reported - The director general of 
Daewoo's representative office in Hanoi recently said that, to date, 
his company has eight investment projects in Vietnam, capitalized at 
$421 million, and is planning 12 more projects capitalized at about 
$1 billion.  The upcoming projects include a $6-million joint 
venture with the Bach Tuyet Paint Company in Ho Chi Minh City and a 
$224-million electronic goods assembly venture in Hanoi.  (Ho Chi 
Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON (24 Feb-2 Mar 94 p 7) 

   Daewoo reportedly wants to "push forward" and increase its 
investment in northern Vietnam to $1 billion in 1995.  With two 
major projects capitalized at nearly $300 million--the Orion joint 
venture to produce TV tubes and the Dai Ha Commercial Center near 
Cau Giay in Hanoi--the ROK conglomerate is now the top investor in 
northern Vietnam.  According to the director general of Daewoo's 
representative office in Hanoi, the firm is presently operating 
and/or negotiating 23 investment projects in Vietnam.  Seven of them 
have been licensed, including the two projects mentioned above, a 
$10-million joint venture with Vietcombank in banking services, a 
$3-million joint venture with Viettronics Dong Da to produce 
electronic parts, a $2-million garment manufacturing joint venture, 
a $4-million joint venture (Viglacera) with the Dap Cau glass 
factory, and an $8.1-million joint venture (Vipesco) to produce 
insecticide. 

   Among other Daewoo projects waiting to be licensed are:  a joint 
venture with the Vietnamese Defense Ministry to assemble buses, 
vans, and cars, capitalized at $40 million; a joint venture with the 
Railways General Department to build railroad cars; and a project to 
upgrade Route 18 between Hanoi and Quang Ninh Province.  (Hanoi THOI 
BAO KINH TE VIETNAM Dec 93 p 12) 

   Effect of Devalued Yuan on Trade Reported - Early this year, 
China devalued its currency by 51 percent, down to 8.7 yuan to the 
dollar; consequently, the value of the yuan on the China-Vietnam 
border dropped from 1,290 dong at the end of 1993 to 1,250 dong two 
weeks later, and is expected to continue to go down.  The weaker 
yuan has reportedly dealt a "crucial blow" to the Vietnamese 
economy. 

   In 1990, exports to China totaled $7.8 million and imports from 
China $4.6 million.  In 1992, they surged to $95 million and $73.4 
million, respectively.  Chinese statistics show that the value of 
cross-border trade rose from 400 million yuan (about $80 million) in 
1989 to 3 billion yuan (about $500 million) in 1992. 

   As a result of the devaluation of the yuan, it will be more 
difficult to export Vietnamese goods to China.  Currently, petroleum 
and rubber are the top export goods for the Chinese market, followed 
by handicraf ts.  If the export volume of these goods destined for 
China were to decrease, it will also mean a drop in foreign exchange 
earnings for Vietnam.  (Hanoi TUAN BAO QUOC TE 2 Feb 94 p 10) 

   Growing Demand for Cars Reported - According to the Ministry of 
Communications and Transportation, Vietnam has imported an average 
of 20,000 cars annually in the past four years.  In 1990, the 
country had about 170,000 cars in circulation.  The figure for 1993 
rose to 270,000, of which half are said to be "very old."  Ho Chi 
Minh City alone reportedly has about 70,000 vehicles of all types. 

   Currently, the demand for the Vietnamese market comes to about 
20,000 to 25,000 vehicles annually.  By the year 2000, it is 
expected that demand will increase to 60,000 vehicles, of which 60 
percent will be passenger cars, 20 percent trucks and 20 percent 
vans. 

   Toyota models and the South Korean "Kia" are reportedly selling 
well in Vietnam.  Toyota sold some 2,500 new cars to Vietnam in four 
months in 1993.  According to Ho Chi Minh City car dealers, in the 
past few years, nearly half of the vehicles imported by Vietnam have 
been Toyota's.  Kia's are said to be "easy to sell" in Vietnam 
because they are less expensive than other cars, however, Kia sales 
are said to be still "very limited."  (Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO 
KINH TE SAIGON 26 Jan 94 pp 10, 11) 

   Joint Venture With Hong Kong Firm To Renovate Office Complex - 
Hanoi's Ho Tay Production Services Company (HSC) and Hong Kong's 
South Sea Development Company Ltd. have formed a 20-year joint 
venture to renovate a business office complex in Trang Tien, Hanoi. 
The new venture, Trang Tien Company Ltd., was licensed in late 
January, with $12.5 million in capital.  Its prescribed capital 
totals $10 million, with equal shares for the two sides.  (Hanoi 
NHAN DAN 4 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Southern Provinces To Build Rice Mill With South Korea - South 
Korea and the provinces of An Giang, Dong Thap, and Long An have 
formed a 50-year joint venture to build a rice mill that will 
produce a "special variety" of rice this year.  The mill will be 
located in Long An and will have an annual production capacity of 
9,000 metric tons.  Investment capital in the project totals $10 
million, of which the Vietnamese side is contributing 40 percent. 
(Hanoi NHAN DAN 7 Mar 94 p 1) 

   Steel Joint Venture Formed With ROK Companies - South Korea's 
Posco Ltd. and KYC Ltd. (Keoyang), the Vietnam Steel General Company 
(VSC), and the Hai Phong Engineering, Construction Enterprise (HPC) 
have formed a 25-year joint venture in Hanoi to produce rolled steel 
and steel bars.  The venture was licensed in January, with a total 
investment of $56.12 million.  Prescribed capital is $16.9 million, 
of which VSC is contributing 34 percent, HPC 16 percent, Posco 45 
percent, and KYC 5 percent.  (Hanoi NHAN DAN 8 Mar 94 p 2) 

   Oil Services Company Expands Operations - Increased oil-drilling 
operations in the South China Sea have enabled the Vietnam Petroleum 
Technical Service Company (PTSC) to expand services.  These include 
providing technical workers, escort ships, and logistical bases for 
foreign oil companies.  PTSC has provided these companies with 200 
technical workers for foreign ships and oil rigs.  In 1993, the 
company had sales of almost $20 million.  It plans to extend its 
operations this year through joint ventures with foreign partners 
and by increasing its fleet of technical service ships.  It is 
prepared to take part in a pipeline contruction project to bring 
natural gas from offshore oil platforms.  (Hanoi VNA 1246 GMT 20 Mar 
94) 

   Government To Restore Two Riverways - The Vietnamese Government 
will give priority to restoring two important riverways linking Ho 
Chi Minh City with the Mekong River Delta provinces.  Total 
investment for this project is estimated at about $47 million. 
(Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 17 Mar 94) 

   Dong Nai Has 53 Licensed Investment Projects - Dong Nai Province 
has 53 investment projects with a total capital of over $520 
million, that have been licensed by the State Committee for 
Cooperation and Investment.  Many enterprises with foreign capital 
are operating profitably, and to date, their industrial output value 
total over $60 million, or 18 percent of the province's total 
industrial output value. (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam Network 2300 GMT 16 
Mar 94) 

   Rice Exports Reached 1.7 Million Metric Tons in 1993 - Vietnam 
exported 1.7 million metric tons of rice in 1993, an increase of 10 
percent over the previous year.  The government has asked the 
Ministry of Finance, the State Bank, the State Planning Commission, 
and the Ministry of Agriculture and Food Industry to ensure that 
there will be enough cash to buy up all surplus rice from farmers. 
Vietnam plans to export 2 million metric tons of rice this year. 
(Hanoi Voice of Vietnam Netowrk 0500 GMT 17 Mar 94) 

   Swedish Group Looks To Increase Trade - Two-way trade between 
Sweden and Vietnam stood at about $35 million in 1993, more than 3.5 
times the 1992 figure.  The Elof Hansson group of Sweden recently 
expressed interest in buying textiles, garments, and sports wares 
from Vietnam for the Swedish and north European markets.  At the 
same time, the group expects to sell paper-manufacturing equipment 
to Vietnam.    (Hanoi VNA 0639 GMT 23 Mar 94) 

   Hong Kong Firm, Southern Provinces To Build Rice Mill - The 
provinces of Long An, Tien Giang, Dong Thap, and An Giang have 
entered into a joint venture with Hong Kong's Viet Nguyen Company to 
build a rice mill that will produce 90,000 tons of rice annually for 
export.  The mill will be located in Long An's Ben Luc District. 
Initial capital in the joint venture is $10 million.  (Hanoi Voice 
of Vietnam 1100 GMT 19 Mar 94) 

   Cement Joint-Venture Company Inaugurated - The Sao Mai Cement 
Company, a joint venture between the Ha Tien Cement Company No. 1 
and Switzerland's Holderbank Financiere Glaris, Ltd., has been 
officially inaugurated in Hanoi.  It has a total capital of $233.8 
million, including a legal capital of $112.4 million for a maturity 
period of 50 years.  Thirty-five percent of the legal capital comes 
from the Vietnamese side.  The company will build a factory in Hon 
Chong District, Kien Giang Province, with a designed capacity of 1.7 
million metric tons per year, and a cement receiving station in Thu 
Duc, Ho Chi Minh City.  (Hanoi VNA 0630 GMT 18 Mar 94) 

   Quang Nam-Da Nang Hosting 25 Foreign Ventures - To date, the 
central province of Quang Nam-Da Nang has 25 joint-venture projects 
with foreign partners, with a total capital of $163.3 million, 
including $67.4 million in authorized capital.  Most of the ventures 
in agriculture, forest and sea products processing, chemicals, and 
tourism are with investors from Taiwan, Japan, Hong Kong, Malaysia, 
France, Australia, Thailand, and Russia.  The provincial External 
Economic Office is currently  evaluating 15 projects in heavy 
industry, mineral exploitation, and building materials production. 
The work is expected to be completed this year.  (Hanoi VNA 0605 GMT 
29 Mar 94) 

   Australian Firm Invests $197 Million in Telecommunications - The 
Australian Tells tar Company is investing in a project to assist the 
Vietnamese Posts and Telecommunication Department in expanding and 
modernizing its international telecommunication services.  Under a 
10-year   agreement, Tellstar will contribute $197 million and 
Vietnam $90 million to the project.  Tellstar is also engaged in 
installing two earth satellites in Hanoi and Ho Chi Minh City and in 
upgrading the international telecom network.  Tells tar recently 
invested $60 million to build an international optical fiber line 
under the sea bed from Vung Tau in southern Vietnam, via Thailand, 
to Hong Kong.  The line is scheduled to be in operation by December 
1995.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 29 Mar 94) 

   Thai Firm To Invest in Fishing Net Factory - The first request 
for space in the Can Tho Export Processing Zone (EPZ) was filed on 
17 March by a Thai fishing gear production group to the Can Tho EPZ 
Construction and Development Company.  It is reported that the Thai 
group plans to invest $8 million in a fishing net factory that will 
generate 1,000 local jobs.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 21 Mar 
94) 

   Japanese Firm Sets Up Wood Chips Joint Venture - Japan Nisho Iwai 
Corporation and five state-owned Vietnamese firms have set up a 
joint venture in Da Nang to produce wood chips for paper and pulp. 
The new venture, named Vija Chip, is capitalized at over $1.6 
million, with the Japanese firm holding a 60-percent share and the 
local partners the remaining 40 percent.  It will begin exporting 
wood chips to Japan as early as June.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 
GMT 26 Mar 94) 
EAG/7APR94/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP/PF 08/0038z Apr 

